Skip to main navigation
Skip to content
Skip to footer
Contents
Introduction
Our Privacy Promise
Who is Slimming World?
What information will Slimming World collect about me?
What if my success story is selected for the magazine or publicity?
How will Slimming World use the information it collects about me?
Your Slimming World Online or LifelineOnline account
When will Slimming World contact me?
Will I be contacted for marketing purposes?
Will Slimming World share my personal information with anyone else?
Slimming World Online virtual groups privacy information
Offensive or inappropriate content on Slimming World websites, social media pages etc
What if I’m a user aged under 18?
How long will Slimming World keep my information?
How secure is my personal information?
Do you transfer my data to another country?
Can I delete my data?
Can I find out what personal information Slimming World holds about me?
What if I’m accessing Slimming World websites from outside the UK?
Web browser cookies – our Cookies Policy
Apps and devices
Consultant recruitment
Changes to Slimming World’s Privacy Promise
Contacting Slimming World about this Privacy Promise
Slimming World’s Privacy Promise
Last updated 19th December 2024
Introduction
At Slimming World, we’re committed to safely, securely and responsibly protecting the data we hold. Our Privacy Promise below explains in detail our commitment to confidentiality, including how we use member information, who we share it with, how long we keep it for, how we keep it safe and how members can request the information we hold about them.
If anything is unclear or you have questions, please don’t hesitate to contact the
Data Protection Officer
.
Our Privacy Promise
We take your privacy very seriously and so should you. So please read this Privacy Promise to understand how we handle your personal information and how we keep that information secure.
Whether you’re an online member or a member of one of our groups, or you’re visiting our website for the first time, we want you to know that your personal information is important to us and we value the trust and faith you put into Slimming World to deliver the best service and support to help you succeed with your weight loss.
We want to help you get the most from Slimming World and we use your personal information to provide you with the services most relevant to you.
At Slimming World, we’re committed to maintaining confidentiality and protecting your privacy, and this Privacy Promise explains why we need your personal information, what we do with that personal information, and how we ensure it’s kept safe and secure.
We explain the ways in which your personal data is used if you’re:
a member of one of our groups
a group member using our LifelineOnline website and app
a Slimming World Online member
a visitor to our website and app
Who is Slimming World?
Slimming World is the trading name of Miles-Bramwell Executive Services Limited. Company number 01242071.
Registered office: Clover Nook Road, Somercotes, Alfreton, Derbyshire DE55 4SW.
There are a number of Slimming World group companies, however, this is the company you should contact if you have queries. It’s this company that is primarily responsible for making sure your personal information is kept appropriately, safely and securely.
As a business, Slimming World has responsibilities for looking after your personal information. All our employed staff with access to your personal information are trained and aware of their responsibilities for the safe processing of your personal information.
Our group services
Slimming World Consultants are self-employed franchisees operating under licence from Slimming World. They are trained to run their groups by Slimming World. You’re a Slimming World member of your Consultant’s group and they’re responsible for collecting and processing your personal information and any data needed to provide you with their services.
Slimming World as a business and your Consultant have responsibilities for looking after your personal information. All our Consultants are trained and aware of their responsibilities for the safe processing of your personal information.
For the purposes of this Privacy Promise, ‘Slimming World’ refers to Slimming World as a business and our self-employed Consultants.
What information will Slimming World collect about me?
When you join as a member either at one of our groups or online, we need some personal information to manage your membership and to ensure our weight loss services are effective and suitable for you. This information can include:
contact details such as your name, email address, postal address, telephone or mobile number
information such as your gender or date of birth
information about your medical history and health, including your GP’s name and address, to help us provide guidance and support through the Slimming World programme
throughout your membership we will collect information relating to your weight and your weight loss progress. We may also record other personal details provided by you, which we will use to help provide you with the most effective weight loss support
You can only become a member if it’s appropriate and safe to do so, and we fully understand that this information is personal and needs to be kept secure and private.
If you participate in, access or sign up to any of Slimming World’s services, activities or online content, such as newsletters, competitions, live chats, message boards, web and mobile notifications, or telephone or text Slimming World, or create an account using our online registration system, we may receive personal information about you.
This can consist of information such as your name, email address, postal address, telephone or mobile number, gender or date of birth, as well as information collected about your use of Slimming World services (such as what you read or watch on the Slimming World website).
If you’ve joined your Slimming World group as part of a Slimming World on Referral scheme, we may also require additional information related to your membership, which the referring organisations use for statistical purposes.
Where we provide personalised services we may ask your permission to review third-party data about you,
for example, your Twitter or Facebook feeds, to get to know you better and to provide more effective personalisation.
Some of our services enable you to sign in via a third-party service, such as Facebook. If you choose to sign in via a third-party app, you will be presented with a dialog box which will ask your permission to allow Slimming World to access your personal information (eg your full name, date of birth, email address and any other information you have made publicly accessible). Please note that any information that is not required by the particular service you have opted to use will not be retained by Slimming World.
Slimming World collects information about how you use Slimming World apps, Slimming World websites or other Slimming World content online, and the device(s) you use to access the services. This includes collecting unique online identifiers such as IP addresses (numbers that can uniquely identify a specific computer or other network device on the internet). Occasionally we may record your on-screen activity to help develop and improve our members’ digital experience. Any data we collect in this way is completely anonymous. For details of how to opt out of our screen recordings visit
https://www.hotjar.com/policies/do-not-track/
For details of the cookies we use on the Slimming World websites and apps, including screen recordings, see our full
Cookies Policy.
Incoming and outgoing telephone calls
Slimming World has a telephone system that is capable of recording conversations. Incoming and outgoing telephone calls may be recorded for the legitimate interests of quality monitoring and training purposes. This may include calls involving business mobile devices. The voice recording system will be operated with due regard for the privacy of individual employees and callers to Slimming World.
All employees working in areas where call recording is activated are aware of its use. Employees can disable call recording and are trained and aware of the process required. If no pre-recorded message is available, employees must inform the caller that their call is being recorded.
If a caller objects or requests the call is not recorded, then the recording feature must be disabled and confirmed to the caller.
When handling telephone enquiries involving card payment details, employees must disable the call recording function before requesting such details.
All recordings are retained by Slimming World for a maximum period of three months and are not shared with any third parties or used in any way for marketing or promotional activities.
Our use of Salesforce
Slimming World uses a third party online platform called Salesforce to manage and record details of enquiries made to our customer support teams. To improve the service we offer to our members, when you enter into a live chat with our member support team we will store the details you provide within Salesforce. The information you share with us can be deleted at your request.
Salesforce also manages all email contact we have with you as a member or subscriber, including marketing emails. You’ll find more information about this in the ‘Will I be contacted for marketing purposes’ section of this Privacy Policy.
All information processed within Salesforce is in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Other information
Sometimes we will ask you for additional personal information, and sometimes sensitive personal information (eg if you’ve entered a competition or sent in your story to be used in our magazine or for publicity). When we do this we only use the personal information with your explicit consent, and we will provide further information at the time about why we’re collecting your information and how we’ll use it.
If you’re the parent or guardian of a child under 18
Our online membership services are only suitable for adults aged 18 years and over.
Our Consultants’ group membership services are suitable for adults and young adults aged 16 and 17, including access to additional online support via LifelineOnline.
What if my success story is selected for the magazine or publicity?
We will ask you to sign a Member Consent Form outlining:
Ways in which we may share your story
The reach of your potential audience
What personal information we may wish to include
Your part in the approval process
We promise that we will not publish information that:
Reveals your physical or online address or any other information that allows a reader to directly contact you, unless you give us permission to publish your social media handle.
Gives medical or other personal information that is not directly relevant to your weight loss story.
Identifies children or any other young person without their parents’ or legal guardians’ consent.
Identifies any other person without that person’s consent – eg your spouse or partner, your friends or other relatives.
We will store your information in relation to your story as follows:
Your personal information and photographs (provided by you and/or commissioned by us) in relation to your weight loss story will be held on our secure head office servers located in the UK.
Your contact details will be held on Slimming World’s database in case we need to contact you regarding your weight loss story in future. This database is stored on our secure head office servers located in the UK.
We may transfer and store your weight loss story, photographs and contact details outside the European Economic Area (EEA) for the purposes set out in this consent form. Where we use your weight loss story for international publicity we will do our best to ensure your information is held safely on secure servers that comply with our Data Protection Promise and only used for the purposes covered by your consent.
If you have any concerns about what you are agreeing to, please discuss this with a member of the Slimming World Head Office team dealing with your story.
If you have any concerns about the use of your data,
contact the Data Protection Officer
.
How will Slimming World use the information it collects about me?
Slimming World (and for group members your Consultant) will use your personal information for a number of purposes including the following:
To provide you with our services and administer your membership. Without this information Slimming World would be unable to offer you our service and support and we will be unable to accept you as a member. When you join Slimming World you’re agreeing to our terms and conditions, including this Privacy Promise.
To provide our online content, services and activities, or to provide you with information about them and to deal with your requests and enquiries.
To contact you in relation to our weight loss services. We will not send you unrelated marketing material, nor will we transfer your personal information to third parties for marketing purposes.
To provide our website Nearest Group service, we ask for a postcode.
To ensure we’re publishing content users need and want, the Slimming World website collects information about your usage of our site. We only use this information in aggregated form (so that no individuals are identified) for improving our online services. For more information, read our
Cookies Policy
.
To provide you with the most user-friendly online navigation experience.
For ‘service administration purposes’, which means that Slimming World may contact you for reasons related to the service, activity or online content you’ve signed up for (eg to give you password reminders, to notify you that a particular service, activity or online content has been suspended for maintenance, to notify you of updates to our Privacy Promise or Terms of Use, or to let you know if your Slimming World account has become dormant and to ask if you’d like to use it again before we close it).
We may analyse the information you supply, as well as your activity, so we can offer a more tailored service. For example, we could use your website viewing history to provide personalised menu recommendations.
When using our digital services, or if you’ve subscribed to our email newsletters, we may use your information to inform you of special offers and provide other marketing information which we think you may find of interest. If you’d rather not receive this information, you can opt-out by simply clicking the link to unsubscribe at the bottom of any marketing emails.
To contact you about a submission you’ve made, including any content you provide. For additional information, please see our
Terms Of Use
.
To process your magazine subscription through Select Publisher Services, who manage and process your subscription.
To use IP addresses and device identifiers to identify the location of users, to block disruptive use; to establish the number of visits from different countries, and to determine where you’re accessing our services from. If you access our services from outside the UK, you may be redirected to the appropriate Slimming World website for the country/territory you’re in.
Slimming World also keeps your personal information as a member for use as part of our scientific or historical research purposes to develop our methods and services. Access is carefully restricted and controlled and the information will only be used in the research and development of our weight loss services. As part of our research, we may work in partnership with other research bodies, such as universities.
We may also use and disclose information in aggregate (so that no individuals are identified) for marketing and strategic development purposes.
Where we record an incoming or outgoing call, under normal circumstances the call will not be retrieved or monitored unless:
- it is necessary to investigate a complaint
- it is part of a performance-management check that customer service standards are being met
- there is a threat to the health and safety of staff or visitors, or for the prevention or detection of crime
- it is necessary to check compliance with regulatory procedures
- it will improve standards in call handling through use in the training and coaching of employees. Use of any recording for training purposes in this way will only be permitted if the recording is edited so that the caller remains anonymous and the employee who was party to the call agrees to its being used in this way
Where Slimming World proposes using your personal information for any other uses, we will ensure that we notify you first and, if necessary, seek your consent.
Your Slimming World Online or LifelineOnline account
If you’ve registered for a Slimming World online account, all your information is stored in a single database for use by all of our web services.
Where you provide personal data, including health information, through Slimming World Online or LifelineOnline, we may use this information to provide you with tailored features and functionality.
When you post in our online community we may use or reproduce the content. For details of how we would use this community content, see our
Terms Of Use
.
If you decide to move your membership from a Slimming World group membership to Slimming World Online, there are some important things to remember:
Your Slimming World Consultant operates as a self-employed franchisee under licence from Slimming World. You’re a Slimming World member of your Consultant’s group and the transfer does not delete your group record or personal information.
As a Slimming World Online member, your membership is administered and processed by Slimming World.
If you no longer want your group record or personal information retained, please contact your Consultant or refer to point 15 of this policy, ‘Can I delete my data?’.
We may use carefully selected third parties to help improve the quality of our online offering, and to help us shape the creation of new services by storing, tracking and analysing user preferences and trends, and to ensure that your use of our online products and services is right for you.
At all times Slimming World is the owner of the information collected through our online products and services.
We work with two payment gateways – MasterCard and Adyen – for our online payments. MasterCard and Adyen process your payment information on our behalf, details such as credit/debit card numbers are not stored by us.
As someone who has registered for a Slimming World Online or LifelineOnline account, on occasion Slimming World may invite you to take part in research studies. Your participation is entirely voluntary and you’ll always be asked for your consent before taking part.
When you visit slimmingworld.co.uk or use our website to log in to Slimming World Online or LifelineOnline, we use cookies to store a little bit of information about you while you’re using the website or, in some instances, to make your next visit even easier for you. You’ll find more details in our full
Cookies Policy
.
When will Slimming World contact me?
To ensure we're delivering the best possible experience, Slimming World may contact you about a service, activity or any online content you’ve signed up for. The service messages will help you administer your membership and provide guidance and support for your weight loss journey. Examples include:
Weigh-in reminders for Slimming World Online members.
Membership newsletters that make up a key part of your paid-for group or online service. These may be personalised based on the preferences you've shared with us.
Requests to verify your email when you sign up for an online account, or to help you reset your password.
If you’re a group member, your Consultant may also contact you directly about any service they provide, or to tell you about changes to their group time or date, for example. If you don’t attend their group regularly they may send you reminder emails of their services while your details remain on our database as a member (see the section, ‘How long will Slimming World keep my information?’).
As these service messages are necessary for your ongoing membership you're unable to unsubscribe from them.
We may also contact you for the following reasons:
to reply to queries or complaints you make about Slimming World's products or services
about any contribution you’ve submitted to Slimming World, eg on any message boards or via text or voicemail message
to invite you to take part in surveys about Slimming World services (participation is always voluntary)
to update you on any material changes to our policies and practices
for marketing purposes, as set out in the section ‘Will I be contacted for marketing purposes?’
We will never contact you to ask for your Slimming World account password, or other login information. Please be cautious if you receive emails or calls from people asking for this information and claiming to be from Slimming World.
If you've joined your Slimming World group as part of a Slimming World on Referral scheme, we may also have additional obligations to contact you as required by the referring organisation. This will normally be at specific intervals after your membership has commenced, for example at six or 12 months after you start your membership, and will be a part of the terms and conditions of the referring organisation. These additional obligations will have been explained to you by the referring organisation or by Slimming World, depending upon the joining process.
Will I be contacted for marketing purposes?
Slimming World will only send you marketing emails or contact you where you’ve agreed to this. We promise we never sell or share your personal information for marketing or promotion of any third-party products.
When you join one of our groups your Consultant will only send you emails about the services they provide. If you don’t attend their group regularly they may send you reminder emails while your details remain on our database as a member (see the section ‘How long will Slimming World keep my information?’).
When you become a member of Slimming World your email address is added to our database and we may use your email to contact you directly about our services, products or information that we believe might interest you. If your membership lapses we may send you reminder emails of our services while your details remain on our database as a member (see the section ‘How long will Slimming World keep my information?’).
When you sign up for our marketing emails via our website or apps, we add your email address to our database and may use your email address to contact you directly about services, products or information we believe might interest you. We use Salesforce Marketing Cloud to send these emails and you can unsubscribe from these at any time using the link in the email.
If you have one of our apps on your mobile device, we may also notify you about services, products or information we believe might interest you through push notifications or alerts to your mobile device. You can deactivate these messages at any time by changing the notification settings on your mobile device.
As part of your Slimming World membership, you'll receive service emails (eg receipts, notifications about your membership, weigh-in reminders) and important messages to help you lose weight, achieve your dream target and stay slim for life, regardless of whether you've opted in to receiving marketing emails.
Will Slimming World share my personal information with anyone else?
The success of the Slimming World business depends upon your trust and we do not sell or share your personal information for marketing or promotion of third-party products.
If you’re a group member, your personal information is shared between your Consultant and Slimming World. As a self-employed franchisee, if your Consultant is not available to attend your group, including holiday and sickness, they will make arrangements for another suitable person to cover their group, and your information would be shared with that person. If your Consultant leaves their franchise, Slimming World would look to make arrangements for another Consultant to cover your group. In either case, your information is only shared for the same purpose – to provide you with the Slimming World service. All requirements of this Privacy Policy will still apply.
Where we want to use your personal information for Slimming World publicity or marketing, we will only do so with your explicit consent, including where this involves the sharing of personal information with a third party.
If you joined your Slimming World group as part of a Slimming World on Referral scheme, we have to share your information with the referring organisation as part of our duties under the referral scheme.
Sometimes Slimming World uses third parties to process your information on our behalf, for example, to provide our online services or for analysis. Slimming World requires these third parties to comply strictly with its instructions and we demand that they do not use your personal information for their own business purposes unless you have explicitly consented to the use of your personal information in this way.
If you subscribe to
Slimming World Magazine
we share your details with Select Publisher Services, who manage and process your subscription. Select Publisher Services collect and process information related to your subscription, you can review their Privacy Policy here:
Privacy Policy - Select Publisher Services
As part of our research, we may work in partnership with other research bodies such as universities. Wherever possible we ensure personal information is anonymised. Where the sharing of personal information is necessary for that research, we ensure the security and confidentiality of your data in accordance with this Privacy Promise.
Third-party advertising and marketing
We may share your hashed email address and other identifiers such as name, location, phone number and browsing behaviour with our marketing partners, and other third-party service providers to assist with our targeting advertising on their sites, apps or social networks. The hashed data does not allow you to be identified or contacted. We use this service to reach new target audience groups which are similar to our existing clients based on their characteristics and other identifiers.
We and our partners compare demographic information including interests and social connections to segment groups based on an automated advanced matching technique of similarities in their profiles. This process can happen in real-time and the matching can be performed independently of the device you are using. In particular, we may use Facebook, Instagram and Google custom audiences which match personal data against platform user data that it already controls to target ads.
You can activate and deactivate these Custom Audiences, Pixels and similar technologies via our website cookie banner. You can also use browser-based ad blockers to prevent Facebook, and others, from tracking your data.
Slimming World has no influence on the advanced matching processes on which data is evaluated by the third party for the purpose of creating reference groups.
You'll find further information on the advertising and targeting process in our
Cookie policy
or in the privacy policies of Facebook, Instagram and Google.
Slimming World Online virtual groups privacy information
When you attend one of our Slimming World Online virtual groups, we'll continue to make sure your personal information is safe and secure and only used for the purposes of providing our services. There are, however, some additional things you should be aware of, which we've outlined below.
The virtual group service may include some or all of these elements:
virtual groups run via Zoom
Facebook Live events on your closed Facebook group
one-to-one support by telephone, to keep us updated with a record of your weight losses
These services are meant for Slimming World members only. Because we're working with third parties, like Facebook and Zoom, there are some elements of the service that we can't claim responsibility for, though. For example, we're unable to restrict access to a Zoom call if someone else has the Zoom link, so to protect yourself and your fellow members, it's important you don't forward the link or share it with non-members.
To respect the privacy of your fellow members,
never record, screenshot or post on social media
anything that happens in a virtual group or Facebook Live event. If you do choose to share personal information during a virtual group on Zoom or through a Facebook Live event, please bear in mind that we can't control how other members in the group use your information.
Please rest assured that we will never record virtual groups without your agreement.
If you have any concerns, you can review the privacy policies of Zoom at
https://zoom.us/privacy
and Facebook at
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
If you have any questions please contact our Data Protection Officer by email at
dpa.officer@slimmingworld.co.uk
Offensive or inappropriate content on Slimming World websites, social media pages etc
If you post or send content which may reasonably be deemed offensive, inappropriate or objectionable anywhere on Slimming World websites or social media pages, or otherwise engage in any disruptive behaviour on any Slimming World service, we may remove such content.
Where Slimming World reasonably believes that you are, or may be, in breach of any applicable laws, for example on hate speech, Slimming World may disclose your personal information to relevant third parties, including to law enforcement agencies or your internet provider. Slimming World would only do so in circumstances where such disclosure is permitted under applicable laws, including data protection law.
What if I’m a user aged under 18?
You can join our group services as a Young Adult member from ages 16 to 17 and we do not require your parent’s or guardian’s consent. In terms of privacy and data protection you will be treated in the same way as any other standard member and shown the Privacy Promise Summary before you join. However, we’ll ensure you understand how your personal data will be used and give you the opportunity to ask questions if there are any points you don’t understand.
How long will Slimming World keep my information?
We will only hold your personal information on our systems for as long as is necessary for the relevant service you’ve signed up for.
As a member, the personal information you give us will be kept for a maximum period of 36 months after your last attendance in group or last online activity as an online member. During this period your details are retained as a lapsed member in case you want to reactivate your membership. We know from our experience that many members want to reactivate their membership and retain their previous weight loss journey. We may contact you about the service you’ve signed up for during this period. If you’re a group member, your Consultant may contact you about the service you’ve signed up for during this period.
In addition, some personal information is held for longer:
as part of our research to help us develop our methods and services. In this case, access is carefully restricted. The information is used only for statistical purposes and is held only as long as is necessary to complete the research
if you joined as part of a Slimming World on Referral scheme. Your information will be kept for statistical purposes during the period of the referral scheme and for a maximum period of 12 months after the end of the scheme
Where we obtain your consent to use your personal information for publicity or promotional purposes, including:
in
Slimming World Magazine
on social media
on our websites
we will retain that information until such time as you withdraw your consent, or the information is no longer suitable for the intended purpose. We will review the personal information held for publicity or promotional on at least an annual basis to identify what is no longer suitable for this purpose so it can be deleted.
How secure is my personal information?
We follow strict security procedures in the processing and disclosure of information which you have given us, to prevent unauthorised access and as required by data protection legislation.
At Slimming World, we understand the value of security and have implemented security policies, rules and robust physical, electronic and managerial procedures to safeguard and secure the personal information we have under our control from unauthorised access, improper use and disclosure, unauthorised destruction or accidental loss.
The personal information and data held on laptops and other equipment used in group is protected from unauthorised access. All data electronically transferred is encrypted and sent by secure methods.
Wherever we use a carefully selected third party to help provide our services, we will always ensure your personal information is processed to the same strict security procedures as indicated in this policy.
Personal information and data stored at Slimming World Head Office is held on secure servers.
Do you transfer my data to another country?
All personal information in relation to our digital platforms is stored on secure servers within the UK or EEA. If we use your success story for the magazine or publicity we may transfer data outside the EEA (see the ‘What if my success story is selected for the magazine or publicity?’ section for more details)
Slimming World operates internationally through a group of companies. These companies are all responsible for the personal information which they collect, and which is processed on their behalf by Slimming World.
Where the personal information of a data subject from the European Economic Area is controlled and processed by Slimming World companies in the UK, appropriate safeguards are in place to ensure the rights and privileges of the data subject are protected.
All Slimming World companies and Franchisee Consultants are committed to your privacy and to make sure your personal information is secure, and we strictly enforce privacy safeguards within all our companies.
Can I delete my data?
We recognise you always have a choice, and that you have chosen Slimming World is special and important to us. You can decide how you use our services and what information you provide to us.
If you stop attending group or subscribing to our online service (ie you cease to be an active member), we still retain your personal information in accordance with our retention policy (see the section: ‘How long will Slimming World keep my information?’).
However, we will consider requests to delete data, unless we have a legal right or obligation to retain your information. For example, we may retain information about your customer identity, such as name and payment history, to help us manage any financial queries that you might raise with us in the future. Furthermore, we may retain personal information for scientific research, or an anonymised version of your personal information. Any use of this personal information would only continue as permitted under this policy.
If you ask us to delete your personal information while you’re an active member, this may result in you no longer being able to continue as a member of Slimming World.
If you’d like us to cancel your membership, delete your personal information, or if you don’t want us to share any information we hold about you with third parties, contact:
for online members, contact our support team by live chat or by phone on 0344 892 0430
for group members, please contact your Consultant, or customer services at Slimming World Head Office on 0344 897 8000
Can I find out what personal information Slimming World holds about me?
Under the data protection legislation you have the right to request a copy of the personal information Slimming World (including your Consultant) holds about you and to have any inaccuracies corrected.
Please contact us if:
you’re worried that any information we may hold about you is incorrect
you want to see what personal information we hold about you (and receive a copy)
you have any queries regarding the accuracy or the processing of your data (including any misuse or unauthorised use)
you want to withdraw your consent where any processing is based upon consent
We may require you to confirm your identity with two forms of approved identification such as:
passport
driving licence
utility bill (from the last three months)
current vehicle registration document
bank statement (from the last three months)
You have the right to see whatever information we hold about you. Please send your request to the Data Protection Officer (contact details below) and we will respond to your request promptly and always within 30 days.
We will use reasonable efforts consistent with our legal duty to supply, correct or delete personal information we hold about you.
Please address any requests and questions about this Privacy Promise to:
Email:
dpa.officer@slimmingworld.co.uk
In writing to:
Attn. of John Pusey
Data Protection Officer
Slimming World
Clover Nook Road
Somercotes
Alfreton
Derbyshire
DE55 4SW
What if I’m accessing Slimming World websites from outside the UK?
Slimming World websites in the UK are published by Slimming World as slimmingworld.co.uk. You can access slimmingworld.co.uk from outside of the UK by searching for this domain name.
Web browser cookies – our Cookies Policy
What is a cookie?
Cookies help us remember you and show you content we think you’ll like.
Our
Cookies Policy
covers Slimming World’s use of any personal information we collect from you via the following online services:
any Slimming World website that links to the Cookies Policy
Slimming World apps
This policy explains:
what information we might collect about you
how we use the information we collect about you
how we use cookies and tracking on the Slimming World websites and apps and how you can manage cookies yourself
How we use cookies
When you visit slimmingworld.co.uk or use our website to log in to LifelineOnline or Slimming World Online, we use cookies to store a little bit of information about you while you’re using the website, or, in some instances, to make your next visit even easier for you.
Here are a few examples of how we use cookies:
If you tick the box ‘Remember my username’ when you log in to the website, we’ll place a cookie on your computer so you don’t have to enter your username again each time you come back.
If you’re a member of Slimming World Online or a Slimming World group and you use LifelineOnline, we need to use a cookie to remember that you logged in – otherwise you wouldn’t see any member-only pages.
Because we want to offer you the best possible service online, we also use cookies to collect anonymous information about how visitors use our website: eg what features they read, if our forms are easy to complete and what time of day they like to come and see us.
Similar technologies are also often used within emails to understand whether the email has been read or if any links have been clicked.
For details of the cookies we use on the Slimming World websites and apps (including screen recordings), see our full
Cookies Policy
.
Apps and devices
When you download or use Slimming World apps on your mobile device, information may be accessed from or stored to your device.
This information is used in a similar way to a web browser cookie, such as enabling the app to store a little bit of information about you while you’re using the app, or, in some instances, to make your next visit even easier for you.
Your web browser or device may also provide Slimming World with information about your device, such as a device identifier or IP address. Device identifiers may be collected automatically, such as the device ID, IP address, MAC address, IMEI number and app ID (a unique identifier relating to the particular version of the app you’re running).
When you sign in to a Slimming World app, your sign-in details may be stored securely on the device so you can access other Slimming World apps on the same device without needing to enter your sign-in details again.
If you have any concerns about the information which might be accessed from or stored on your device by Slimming World, you should consider only accessing our content through a web browser on your PC or laptop, and review your web browser settings (see our
Cookies Policy
).
Consultant recruitment
If you express an interest in becoming a Slimming World Consultant we collect your personal information to assess your application, and to use during your interview if you’re invited to one. We won’t use it for any other purposes without your consent. We may also review personal information from your Slimming World member record.
When using the online recruitment application system we may use cookies. For more information, see our
Cookies Policy
.
Your personal information will be shared with the local Slimming World manager and employees assisting with the recruitment process. Some information will also be shared with the local Team Developer as part of their responsibilities in the recruitment process.
We do not share your personal information with third-party companies.
Slimming World will take reasonable steps to ensure that we retain your personal data only for so long as is necessary for the recruitment process for which it was collected, or as required under any contract or by applicable law.
Changes to Slimming World’s Privacy Promise
Slimming World may update this Privacy Promise from time to time, so you may wish to check it each time you log on to our website or submit personal information to Slimming World.
We will include the date of any changes or updates on this page.
If you do not agree to any of the changes or updates, please don’t continue to use Slimming World websites or to submit personal information to Slimming World. You should contact the
Data Protection Officer
to discuss your concerns.
If important changes are made to the Privacy Promise, for instance affecting how we’d like to use your personal information, we will provide a more prominent notice (including, for some services, email notification of Privacy Promise changes).If you're a Slimming World member (group or online), we will notify you of any important changes or updates via your Consultant or by email.
Contacting Slimming World about this Privacy Promise
If you’re worried that any information we may hold about you is incorrect, then please let Slimming World or your Consultant know and we/they will update our records.
Please contact Slimming World’s Data Protection Officer if you:
have any questions or comments about this Privacy Promise
want to withdraw your consent for any purpose for which it has been provided
are concerned about the misuse or unauthorised use of your personal information
If you’re within the UK, please address any requests and questions about this Privacy Promise to:
Email:
dpa.officer@slimmingworld.co.uk
In writing to:
Attn. of John Pusey
Data Protection Officer
Slimming World
Clover Nook Road
Somercotes
Alfreton
Derbyshire
DE55 4SW
If you’re unhappy or dissatisfied with our response to any concerns you have raised about the security or use of information we hold in relation to you, you can complain to the appropriate supervisory authority. In the UK, this is the
Information Commissioner
’
s Office
.
Privacy preference centre
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information doesn’t usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalised web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change the default settings. Just be aware that blocking certain cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we’re able to offer.
You can read our cookie policy here.
Allow all cookies
Manage consent preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and can’t be switched off. Without them, we can’t provide you with the services you’ve asked for, for example, you wouldn’t be able to set your privacy preferences, log in or fill in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will then not work. These cookies don’t store any information which personally identifies you.
Performance cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources, so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All the information these cookies collect is anonymous. If you don’t allow these cookies, we won’t know when you’ve visited our site and we won’t be able to monitor its performance.
Functional cookies
These cookies enable us to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation on the website and app. They may be set by us or by third-party providers whose services we’ve added to our pages. If you don’t allow these cookies, some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting cookies
These cookies may be set by our advertising partners and are used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They don’t store personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you don’t allow these cookies, you’ll experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Performance Cookies
Vendor Search
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Our Cookies
We use cookies (not the chocolate chip kind!) to bring you the best possible online experience. Please agree to the use of cookies by clicking on allow all cookies, or you can set your preferences by clicking on manage cookies.
Allow all cookies
Manage cookies
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.selectmagazines.co.uk/privacy-policy/:
Magazines
Creative
Inside Crochet
Creative Colouring
Lifestyle
Diva
Slimming World
Lovatts Crossword & Puzzles
Christine's BIG Crossword
Variety Bumper Puzzles
Crossword & Puzzle Collection
MEGA! Crosswords
Colossus Crosswords
ArrowWords
Code Breakers
Wordsearch Collection
The LOT
The WORKS
Christine's Cryptic Collection
Lovatts Inklings
Special Interest
France Today
French Property News
Nile Magazine
Practical Electronics
Scottish Islands Explorer
Sports & Outdoor
Trek & Mountain
Wrestletalk
Trade & Professional
Coaching at Work
Back Issues
Creative Colouring
Diva
Flora Magazine
France Today
French Property News
Inside Crochet
Neo
Nile Magazine
Practical Electronics
Scottish Islands Explorer
Slimming World
Trek & Mountain
Writers' Forum
Wrestletalk
Special Offers
Bookazines
Lovatts Inklings
Christine's Cryptic Collection
Sports & Outdoor
Books & Merchandise
Binders
Gift Vouchers
Floristry Books
Privacy Policy
Home
Privacy Policy
Home
About Select Publisher Services
Contact Us
Shipping & Returns
Terms & Conditions
FAQs
Site Map
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Information we hold
Select Publisher Services (SPS) may hold the following details about you:
personal information, such as your name, address and contact details, including personal information you provided to SPS when you applied for a product or service
details of the subscriptions and products you hold and previously held with SPS
details of when you contact us and when we contact you
payment details (including bank account details for Direct Debits or credit card details for subscription payments)
if you provide us with your personal information we will keep the information for as long as is necessary to comply with any statutory or legal obligations or for audit purposes.
Marketing
Your details are used to help us to identify our products and services (and those of selected third parties) that we believe may be of interest to you, which may be based on products you hold with us. We will not contact you about any other products unless we have your consent to do so.
However, we may contact you with offers for a magazine you have subscribed to previously up to a year after you have received your last issue.
Sharing your details
Within Select Publisher Services and its associated companies
Information about you and any products you hold with us may be used within Select Publisher Services for all purposes necessary for performing our contract with you and for:
understanding your requirements
developing, testing, researching and improving products and services
training and business analysis
legal and regulatory compliance
further promotions if you have given us your consent
With other organisations
SPS may disclose your personal information to other people or organisations if any of the following applies:
we have your consent; or
for the purposes of them providing products, services or research in association with or on behalf of SPS including for example the publisher of the magazine to which you hold a subscription; or
for the purpose of them providing administrative, processing, analytical or other similar services to SPS to assist SPS in the provision of products and services to our customers; or
for the purpose of verifying information you have given us for example verifying your address for sending a magazine if it has been returned to us; or
for the purposes of improving our products, services and marketing communications, with specialist market research organisations who may contact you on our behalf and invite you to take part in market research, but who will not be allowed to use your information for anything else; or
where we have sold their service or product to you; or
where we may transfer rights and obligations under any contract with you; or
where you have purchased a subscription with another organisation and you notify us of amendments to your personal details. You will also need to contact the other organisation to confirm the changes; or
Information you provide upon entering a promotion or competition
: if you enter a promotion or competition you will either need to register an account with us or provide certain personal information which will be used in accordance with the terms of the promotion or competition; or
Information you provide when taking part in a poll or survey
: if you take part in a poll or survey you will either need to register an account with us or provide certain personal information to us which we will use in accordance with the terms of the poll or survey; or
where we are required or permitted to do so by law or regulation.
Select Publisher Services does not share or give any information to external companies for their own marketing purposes.
Social Media
We may monitor and respond to comments or opinions on social networking sites for example Facebook/Twitter.
Website use
Our websites use cookies, web analytics and web logs to collect information about your use of our site, information about your computer such as your computer’s IP address and browser type, demographic data and, if you arrived at our site via a link from a third party site, the URL of the linking page. If you have registered an account with us, it may also collect your name and email address. The data collected through cookies, web analytics and web logs may be transferred to third parties. For more information on how this website uses cookies, see our
cookie policy
.
We use web beacons in our emails to track the success of our marketing campaigns. If you open an email from us, we can see which of the pages of our website you visited. Our web beacons don’t store any information on your computer but, by communicating with our cookies on your computer, they can tell us when you have opened an email from us. We may keep track of the emails that we send you. We also keep a record of what communications you have selected to receive or not to receive. If you would like to opt out of receiving such emails, please click the “unsubscribe” link in the email and follow the instructions.
We own the information we collect through our websites. We will use it, as applicable, to:
provide you with services or information that you have requested or products or services that you have ordered, such as magazine subscriptions;
contact you regarding your registered account with us;
confirm or fulfill an order you have submitted
inform you if you have won a prize
monitor or improve the performance of, and products and services available through, this website
customise the advertising and content that you see
send you promotional materials or special offers on our behalf or on behalf of our group companies and marketing partners if you have given us consent. If you do not want to receive this marketing information you can notify us of this as part of the registration process. You can stop receiving this information at any time by following the unsubscribe instructions on the correspondence you receive, by amending your marketing preferences, or by emailing data@selectps.com, giving your email address and details of the information you no longer wish to receive
for any purpose if we are required to do so by any law or other regulatory or government authority
By providing us with your personal information, you consent to us: (a) processing your information as set out in this privacy policy and in any other manner you expressly consent to; and (b) processing your personal data.
We
may share aggregate, non-personally identifiable information, such as demographics and website usage statistics, with advertisers, sponsors and other organisations.
We
may use a third-party network advertiser to serve potential advertisements on this website or we may use an audience or traffic measurement service to analyse the traffic on this website. Network advertisers are third parties that display advertisements based on your visits to this website and other websites you have visited. Third-party ad serving enables us to target advertisements to you for products or websites you might be interested in. Audience and traffic measurement services allow us to collect anonymous traffic and behavioural information from the website by monitoring anonymous visitor activity. This website’s advertisers, sponsors and/or traffic measurement services may themselves set and access their own cookies on your computer if you choose to have your cookies enabled in your browser.
Your information is collected and stored on servers which are owned and maintained by or on behalf of Select Publisher Services and its group companies. We may keep your information for a reasonable period for the purposes set out in this privacy policy.
Our websites
contains links to a wide variety of other websites and we may display advertisements from third parties on our website. We may monetise some of these links through the use of third party affiliate programmes. Notwithstanding such affiliate programmes, we are not responsible for the content or privacy policies of these websites or for third party advertisers, even if they use the website’s logo as part of a co-branding agreement, nor for the way in which information about their users is treated. Before submitting any personal information to such websites, you should check their privacy policy.
In accordance with our requirements under the Data Protection Act 1998, we will adopt appropriate security procedures to help prevent unauthorised access to your information. Select Publisher Services shall not be liable for any attempt to hack or crack or otherwise gain access to any part of this website including any of your information.
By using our websites you agree to the terms of this privacy policy and our terms & conditions. We may amend this privacy policy and the terms & conditions from time to time. If we do so, we will post an updated version on this website. You will be bound by the new terms upon your continued use of this website.
All our website financial transactions are handled through our payment services provider, Sage Pay. You can review the Sage Pay privacy policy at
www.sagepay.co.uk
. We will share information with Sage Pay only to the extent necessary for the purposes of processing payments you make via our website and dealing with complaints and queries relating to such payments.
Access to your data
Correction of details
You have the right to have any inaccurate information corrected. To request an amendment to your details please write to: The Data Privacy Manager, 62 Wimborne Road, Bournemouth, BH3 7AR or email us on
data@selectps.com
.
How to request your details
You have the right to see and receive a copy of any personal information we may hold on you.
To request a copy of the personal information we hold on you, please write to: The Data Privacy Manager, 62 Wimborne Road, Bournemouth, BH3 7AR.
Please specify in your letter which organisation(s) you are requesting information from and, where possible, include account number(s) and details of the information you require. We will not charge to supply this information.
The right to be ‘forgotten’
We may keep your data for as long as we deem necessary. If you no longer hold any subscription with us and you want to make sure we do not hold any more data about you, you can notify us at any given time at
data@selectps.com
and we will remove you from our database. You might still have to contact associated companies separately that were sent your details with either your consent or to fulfil our contract with you.
You do not currently have Javascript enabled. We recommend that you enable Javascript to use this website more effectively
Sub-policy 1
https://zoom.us/privacy:
Zoom Privacy Statement
This Privacy Statement describes the personal data we collect and/or process (which may include collecting, organizing, structuring, storing, using, or disclosing) to provide products and services offered directly by Zoom Communications, Inc. (“Zoom”), including Zoom’s websites, its meetings, webinars, and messaging platform, related collaborative features, and Zoom App Marketplace (“Zoom products and services” or “products and services”). Zoom products and services covered in this Privacy Statement do not include products or services developed by Zoom that are covered under a separate privacy policy (including those listed
here
). California residents, please see our
California Privacy Notice at Collection
, and
California & Other U.S. State Privacy Rights sections
.
What Personal Data Do We Receive?
How Do We Use Personal Data?
How Do We Share Personal Data?
Who Can See, Share, and Process My Personal Data When I Join Meetings and
Use Other Zoom Products and Services?
Privacy Rights and Choices
Children
How to Contact Us
Retention
European Data Protection Specific Information
California & Other U.S. States Notice at Collection
California & Other U.S. State Privacy Rights
Changes to This Privacy Statement
What Personal Data Do We Receive?
Personal data is any information from or about an identified or identifiable person, including information that Zoom can associate with an individual person. We may collect, or process on behalf of our customers, the following categories of personal data when you use or interact with Zoom products and services:
Account Information
: Information associated with an account that licenses Zoom products and services, which may include administrator name, contact information, account ID, billing and transaction information, and account plan information.
Profile and Participant Information:
Information associated with the Zoom profile of a user who uses Zoom products and services under a licensed account or that is provided by an unlicensed participant joining a meeting, which may include name, display name, picture, email address, phone number, job information, stated locale, user ID, or other information provided by the user and/or their account owner.
Contact Information
: Contact information added by accounts and/or their licensed end users to create contact lists on Zoom products and services, which may include contact information a user integrates from a third-party app, or provided by users to process referral invitations.
Settings
: Information associated with the preferences and settings on a Zoom account or user profile, which may include audio and video settings, recording file location, screen sharing settings, and other settings and configuration information.
Registration Information
: Information provided when registering for a Zoom meeting, webinar, Zoom Room, or recording, which may include name and contact information, responses to registration questions, and other registration information requested by the host.
Device Information
: Information about the computers, phones, and other devices used when interacting with Zoom products and services, which may include information about the speakers, microphone, camera, OS version, hard disk ID, PC name, MAC address, IP address (which may be used to infer general location at a city or country level), device attributes (like operating system version and battery level), WiFi information, and other device information (like Bluetooth signals).
Content and Context from Meetings, Webinars, Messaging, and Other Collaborative Features:
Content generated in meetings, webinars, or messages that are hosted on Zoom products and services (“Customer Content”), which may include audio, video, in-meeting messages, in-meeting and out-of-meeting whiteboards, chat messaging content, transcriptions, transcript edits and recommendations, responses to account owner / host-sponsored post-meeting or webinar feedback requests, responses to polls and Q&A, and files, as well as related context, such as invitation details, meeting or chat name, or meeting agenda. Customer Content may contain your voice and image, depending on the account owner’s settings, what you choose to share, your settings, and what you do on Zoom products and services. As referenced below, Zoom employees do not access or use Customer Content without the authorization of the hosting account owner, or as required for legal, safety, or security reasons.
Usage Information Regarding Meetings, Webinars, Messaging, Collaborative Features and the Website:
Information about how people and their devices interact with Zoom products and services, such as: when participants join and leave a meeting; whether participants sent messages and who they message with; performance data; mouse movements, clicks, keystrokes or actions (such as mute/unmute or video on/off), edits to transcript text, where authorized by the account owner and other inputs that help Zoom to understand feature usage, improve product design, and suggest features; which third-party apps are added to a meeting or other product or service and what information and actions the app is authorized to access and perform; use of third-party apps and the Zoom App Marketplace; features used (such as screen sharing, emojis, or filters); and other usage information and metrics. This also includes information about when and how people visit and interact with Zoom’s websites, including what pages are accessed, interaction with website features including Zoom’s website’s virtual chat feature, and whether or not the person signed up for a Zoom product or service.
Limited Information from Zoom Email and Calendar Services:
“Zoom Email” refers to Zoom’s native email service and emails sent from Zoom’s native email service. Zoom Email is designed to be end-to-end encrypted by Zoom by default for emails sent and received directly between active Zoom Email users. Support for end-to-end encryption requires Zoom Email users to have added a device to their Zoom Email account with the associated email address and to use a supported Zoom client. When an email is end-to-end encrypted, only the users, and, depending on their settings, account owners, or designated account administrators control the encryption key and therefore access to the email content, including body text, subject line, attachments and custom labels applied to messages by users in their inboxes. Emails sent to or received from non-Zoom Email users are encrypted after the email is sent or received from Zoom’s servers, if the Zoom Email user chooses to send them with encryption. In all cases, Zoom does have access to email metadata used for basic email delivery—specifically, email addresses in the from, to, cc, and bcc fields, time, mimeID, and the number and size of attachments. From use of Zoom’s native calendar service, Zoom receives information regarding meeting invitations, body text, sender and recipients, and other calendar information.
Content from Third-Party Integrations:
Account owners and/or their licensed end users can access emails, calendars, files and other information from third-party services through their Zoom client, if they choose to integrate them. This information is not end-to-end encrypted by Zoom, but Zoom employees do not access the contents of third-party-service email, calendar entries, files or other information, unless authorized to, or required for legal, safety, or security reasons. If account owners and/or their licensed end users integrate their third-party emails, calendars, files and/or other information  with products and services offered or powered by Zoom. Zoom may collect or process Customer Content and email, calendar, files and other information, including content, headers, titles, and metadata, from such third-party services.
Communications with Zoom:
Information about, and contents of, your communications with Zoom, including relating to support questions, website virtual chats, your account, feedback provided by users to Zoom about Zoom’s products and services (which is owned by Zoom), and other inquiries.
Information from Partners
: Zoom obtains information about account owners and their users from third-party companies, such as market data enrichment services, including information about an account owner’s company size or industry, contact information, or activity of certain enterprise domains. Zoom may also obtain information from third-party advertising partners that deliver ads displayed on Zoom products and services, such as whether you clicked on an ad they showed you.
In certain jurisdictions, some of the personal data Zoom receives may be considered sensitive. Please see “California & Other U.S. State Privacy Rights” for more information.
How Do We Use Personal Data?
Zoom employees do not access or use Customer Content including meeting, webinar, messaging, or email content (specifically, audio, video, files, in-meeting whiteboards, messaging, or email contents), or any content generated or shared as part of other collaborative features (such as out-of-meeting whiteboards), unless authorized by the account owner hosting the Zoom product or service where the Customer Content was generated, or as required for legal, safety, or security reasons.
Zoom does not use any of your audio, video, chat, screen sharing, attachments or other communications-like Customer Content (such as poll results, whiteboard and reactions) to train Zoom’s or its third-party artificial intelligence models.
As discussed below, and where technically feasible, Zoom uses personal data to conduct the following activities:
Provide Zoom Products and Services:
To provide products and services to account owners, their licensed end users, and those they invite to join meetings and webinars hosted on their accounts, including to customize Zoom products and services and recommendations for accounts of their users. Zoom also uses personal data to determine what products and services may be available in your location, and uses personal data, including contact information, to route invitations, messages, or Zoom Emails to recipients when users send or receive invitations, messages, or Zoom Emails using Zoom products and services. This may also include using personal data for customer support, which may include accessing audio, video, files, messages, and other content or context, including information you provide through Zoom’s website’s virtual chat feature, at the direction of the account owner or their users. We also use personal data to manage our relationships and contracts with account owners and others, including billing, compliance with contractual obligations, facilitating payment to third-party developers in relation to purchases made through the Zoom App Marketplace, and related administration.
Local Device Video Features: If you elect to enable certain video features, if available in your area, such as filters, studio effects, avatars, and gestures, information about your movements or the positioning of your face or hands may be processed on your device to apply the selected features. Such data does not leave your device, is not retained, cannot be used to identify you, and is only used to generate the selected effects.
Enhanced Video Features: If your account owner or administrator and you elect to enable “automatic smart name tags,” and you provide the requisite consent and a reference photo, Zoom may analyze your facial geometry and features from the reference photo you submit and video from the Zoom Room to identify you and tag you by name in the Zoom Room during your meeting. Zoom will store and use your reference photo and data about your facial geometry and features for this purpose while your account owner or administrator and you have this feature enabled. You can disable the automatic smart name tags feature and delete this data any time in your Settings. Zoom will retain this data for this purpose until and unless you choose to delete this data or for up to three years after your last interaction with Zoom.
Enhanced Audio Features: If you elect to enable enhanced audio features, such as personalized audio isolation or automatic smart speaker tags, and provide the requisite consent, Zoom may analyze your voice and create a voiceprint to enhance your audio quality (such as suppressing background noise) and/or to identify you by name. To do this, Zoom may generate your voiceprint from a recording of your voice (if you upload it for this purpose) and/or from meetings that you participate in. Zoom will store and use your voiceprint and reference audio recording for these purposes while you have features that use your voiceprint enabled. You can disable these features and delete this data any time in your Settings. Zoom will retain this data for this purpose until and unless you choose to disable these features and delete this data or for up to three years after your last interaction with Zoom.
Intelligent Features: Zoom provides intelligent features and products to its customers, their licensed end users and guests, such as Zoom AI or other tools to recommend chat, email, or other content, including content from third-party integrations. These tools may use artificial intelligence, machine learning, or other technology to process Customer Content and context solely to provide the intelligent features.
Product Research and Development:
If authorized by any applicable settings, to develop, test, and improve Zoom products and services, and to troubleshoot products and services.
Zoom does not use any of your audio, video, chat, screen sharing, attachments or other communications-like Customer Content (such as poll results, whiteboard and reactions) to train Zoom’s or its third-party artificial intelligence models.
Marketing and Promotions:
If authorized by any applicable settings, to permit Zoom and/or its third party marketing partners to market, advertise, and promote Zoom products and services, including based on your product usage, information we receive from third-party partners, information you provide to process referral invitations, or if you visit our websites, information about how and when you visit, and your interactions with them. We may also use this information to provide advertisements to you relating to Zoom products and services or to engage third party partners to analyze your interactions on our website or app or to deliver advertising to you. Zoom does not use Customer Content for any marketing or promotions.
Authentication, Integrity, Security, and Safety:
To authenticate accounts and activity, detect, investigate, and prevent malicious conduct, fraudulent activity or unsafe experiences, address security threats, protect public safety, and secure Zoom products and services. Zoom uses advanced tools to automatically scan certain types of content such as virtual backgrounds, profile images, incoming emails to Zoom’s native email service from someone who is not a Zoom Email user, and files uploaded or exchanged through chat, for the purpose detecting and preventing violations of our terms or policies and illegal or other harmful activity.
Communicate with You:
We use personal data (including contact information, and information you provide through Zoom’s website’s virtual chat feature, including the content of the messages) to communicate with you about Zoom products and services, including product updates, your account, and changes to our policies and terms. We also use your information to respond to you when you contact us.
Legal Reasons:
To comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, including from law enforcement or government agencies, to investigate or participate in civil discovery, litigation, or other adversarial legal proceedings, protect you, us, and others from fraudulent, malicious, deceptive, abusive, or unlawful activities, and to enforce or investigate potential violations of our Terms of Service or policies.
How Do We Share Personal Data?
Zoom provides personal data to third parties only with consent or in one of the following circumstances (subject to your prior consent where required under applicable law):
Resellers:
If an account owner licensed or purchased Zoom products and services from a third-party reseller of Zoom products and services, the reseller may be able to access personal data and content for users, including meetings, webinars, and messages hosted by the account owner.
Vendors:
Zoom works with third-party service providers to provide, support, and improve Zoom products and services and technical infrastructure, and for business services such as payment processing, including in relation to purchases made through the Zoom App Marketplace. Zoom may also work with third-party service providers to provide advertisements and business analytics regarding Zoom products and services. These vendors can access personal data subject to contractual and technical requirements for protecting personal data and prohibiting them from using personal data for any purpose other than to provide services to Zoom or as required by law. Zoom may integrate third-party technology to provide advanced features, such as Apple’s TrueDepth technology, to process information on your device about your face or hand dimensions and gestures to provide video effects. This information is processed on your device, and such information is neither received nor stored by either the third party, or Zoom.
For Legal Reasons:
Zoom may share personal data as needed to: (1) comply with applicable law or respond to, investigate, or participate in valid legal process and proceedings, including from law enforcement or government agencies; (2) enforce or investigate potential violations of its Terms of Service or policies; (3) detect, prevent, or investigate potential fraud, abuse, or safety and security concerns, including threats to the public; (4) meet our corporate and social responsibility commitments; (5) protect our and our customers’ rights and property; and (6) resolve disputes and enforce agreements.
Marketing, Advertising, and Analytics Partners:
Zoom uses third-party marketing, advertising, and analytics providers: to provide statistics and analysis about how people are using Zoom products and services, including our website; and to provide advertising and marketing for Zoom products and services, including targeted advertising based on your use of our website. These third-party partners may receive information about your activities on Zoom’s website through third-party cookies placed on Zoom’s website. To opt out of our use of third-party cookies that share data with these partners, visit our cookie management tool, available in
Cookies Settings
. Where required by law, Zoom will first obtain your consent before engaging in the marketing or advertising activities described.
Corporate Affiliates:
Zoom shares personal information with corporate affiliates, such as Zoom Voice Communications, Inc., to provide integrated and consistent experiences across Zoom products and services (such as enabling an account owner or their user to integrate a Zoom Phone call into a meeting) and to detect, investigate, and prevent fraud, abuse, and threats to public safety.
Change of Control:
We may share personal data with actual or prospective acquirers, their representatives and other relevant participants in, or during negotiations of, any sale, merger, acquisition, restructuring, or change in control involving all or a portion of Zoom’s business or assets, including in connection with bankruptcy or similar proceedings.
Third-Party Developers:
If you purchase a third-party app or integration from the Zoom App Marketplace, Zoom may share information about the purchase with the third-party developer, to provide the app or integration.
Who Can See, Share, and Process My Personal Data When I Join Meetings and Use Other Zoom Products and Services?
When you send messages or join meetings and webinars or use other collaborative features on Zoom, other people and organizations, including third parties outside the meeting, webinar, message, or other collaborative features, may be able to see, share, and process content and information that you share:
Account Owner:
An account owner is the organization or individual that signs up for a Zoom account. Typically, an account owner designates one or more people (called an “administrator”) to manage their account and can grant privileges to users on the account. Depending on their license with Zoom, the account owner can authorize additional users on their account, and the account owner can create and/or access the profile information for all users on their account. The account owner and their users can invite others (including guests not on their account and unlicensed participants) to meetings or webinars hosted on their account. Zoom gives account owners controls and features that they can use to determine whether certain types of content, such as recordings or Zoom Team Chat messages, can be created or sent, and what third-party apps can be used, for meetings and webinars hosted on their account. Depending on their settings, account owners and the users they designate can access personal data for participants who join meetings and webinars on their account or send messages to users on their account. Account owners may also be able to determine what information Zoom and others can access and use. Specifically, account owners may have access to:
Account Usage:
Product Usage:
Information about how users and their devices interact with their account, which may include who sent messages to their users in chat, email addresses, IP addresses, device information, and other information about who joined meetings or webinars on their account, whether their users viewed or downloaded a recording, how long participants participated in their meetings, the time a message was sent, information about integrations, and other usage information and feedback metrics.
Participant List:
Information about the participants in a Zoom meeting, webinar, or chat, which may include name, display name, email address, phone number, and participant or user ID.
Registration Information:
Information provided during registration for a webinar, meeting, Zoom Room, or recording hosted by the account.
Zoom Team Chat and Out-of-Meeting Collaborations:
If enabled on their account, account owners and those they authorize can see information about who sent and received Zoom Team Chat messages, including synced in-meeting messages (e.g., from a dedicated meeting group chat that is synced with Zoom Team Chat), to users on their account, along with information about the message (for example, date and time, and number of members or participants). Depending on their settings, account owners also can see sender and receiver information, and other messaging data, along with the content of messages sent to and from users on their account (including from in-meeting chat where dedicated meeting group chats are enabled), unless the account owner has enabled
Advanced Chat Encryption
. Depending on their settings, account owners and those they authorize may also see the content shared through collaborative features, including whiteboards, files, and images shared in Zoom Team Chat.
In-Meeting/Webinar Messages:
Depending on their settings, account owners can see sender and receiver information, along with the content of messages sent to and from users on their account, in the following circumstances:
Messages sent to Everyone in a meeting that is recorded
Messages sent to the meeting group chat in a meeting when a dedicated meeting group chat is enabled
Messages sent to panelists in a webinar that is recorded
Messages sent in dedicated meeting group chats in Team Chat
Direct messages if the account owner has enabled archiving
If a participant in a meeting is subject to archiving, their account owner will have access to messages sent to Everyone in the meeting, as well as direct messages sent to that participant. If a participant who is a member of a dedicated meeting group chat is subject to archiving, the member’s account owner will have access to the meeting group chat messages, as well as direct messages sent to that member. If a guest in a meeting with a dedicated meeting group chat is subject to archiving, the guest’s account owner will have access to messages sent to the meeting group chat, as well as direct messages sent to that guest.
Recordings and Transcripts:
Account owners can view and share the recordings and transcripts of meetings and webinars hosted on their account. Account owners may be able to view and share content generated by intelligent features that use the recording or transcript.
Other Collaborative Feature Content (e.g., Zoom Email, Zoom Calendar, Zoom Docs, Clips, Whiteboard, Notes, Polls, Q&A, Feedback, ):
Depending on their settings, account owners and designated account administrators can access content hosted on their account. For example, depending on their settings, account owners and designated account administrators can access email and calendar content sent to and from users on their Zoom Email or Zoom Calendar accounts, even if those Zoom Emails are encrypted. In addition, account owners can see information about who provided responses to their polls, Q&A, or post-meeting or webinar feedback requests, including name and contact information, together with the responses or feedback, unless responses are submitted anonymously.
Meeting Hosts, Participants, and Invitees:
Meeting hosts, participants, and invitees may be able to see your email, display name, profile picture, and presence status, including in Zoom meetings and in Zoom’s native calendar service. Meeting hosts, participants, and invitees can also see and (depending on the account owner’s settings) record, save, and share meeting content, audio transcripts, messages sent to Everyone, messages sent to meeting group chats (where enabled, and whether sent in Team Chat or in-meeting), or messages sent to them directly, and files, whiteboards or other information shared with them (including during a meeting, or through a dedicated meeting group chat). Meeting hosts may also share meeting assets to Zoom Team Chat, depending on their account owner’s settings. Meeting hosts may also be able to see responses to Q&A and polls generated during the meeting.
Zoom Email, Calendar and Zoom Team Chat Recipients:
Recipients of Zoom Emails and Zoom Calendar invites can see, save, and share your email and calendar content with others, including by sharing emails to Zoom Team Chat. If a recipient shares encrypted content with others, for example, by sharing an encrypted Zoom Email to Zoom Team Chat, or forwarding an encrypted Zoom Email to a third-party recipient without a Zoom Email account, the shared or forwarded content will not be end-to-end encrypted by Zoom. Recipients of Zoom Team Chats can see your messages, reactions, emojis, and related content, including content from Zoom Emails, Zoom Calendar, and emails from third-party services integrated in the Zoom client, that you or a third-party choose to share to Zoom Team Chat, and in-meeting messages that participants send that are synced with Zoom Team Chat through dedicated meeting group chats. Depending on the account owner’s settings, Zoom Team Chat recipients may record, save, or share your messages.
Webinar Panelists and Attendees:
Only panelists may be visible to attendees during a webinar, but attendees who agree to unmute can be heard by other attendees. If an attendee agrees to become a panelist during a webinar, they may be visible to other attendees, depending on settings. Panelists and attendees may be able to see the name of a participant who asks a question during a Q&A, along with their question, unless the participant submits the question anonymously.
Intelligent Features:
Users may be able to access, based on underlying permissions, customer content and context from meetings, webinars, messaging, and other collaborative features through their use of intelligent features.
Livestreams:
Meeting and webinar hosts can choose to livestream to a third-party site or service, which means anyone with access to the livestream will be able to see the meeting or webinar.
Apps and Integrations:
Account owners can choose to add Zoom-developed apps and third-party apps to their account and the Zoom products they use, including via use of the Zoom App Marketplace, and they can also control whether their users can add and use specific Zoom and third-party apps, including in meetings, webinars, and chats hosted on their account.
Account owners can also choose to integrate other content from third-party services – such as third-party email communications, calendar entries, files and other information – with apps and services that they use.
Depending on their settings, account owners’, users’ and guests’ personal data and content may be shared with apps and integrations, including Zoom-developed apps, approved by account owners, which may include all of the personal data categories listed above, such as account information, profile and contact information, registration information, participants list, settings, content, product usage, device information, or third-party emails that have been shared with the app.
Other participants in the meeting may be able to see the app that you are using in a meeting, if the app is receiving content (including audio and video) from the meeting.
Third-party developers may also integrate or embed Zoom meetings into their website or app experiences or build versions of Zoom that enable access to Zoom products from a third-party app.
Personal information shared by account owners and users with third-party apps and integrations is collected and processed in accordance with the app developers’ terms and privacy policies, not Zoom’s.
Privacy Rights and Choices
Marketing Communications
If you don’t want to learn about products and services we or our partners offer, you can opt-out of marketing communications in the communication sent to you (for example, via email or SMS), or by emailing
privacy@zoom.us
. Not all of our communications are for marketing, and you’ll continue to receive messages related to your products and services, such as bills, transactional notices, or customer service. Zoom will not share any mobile data originating from you through a text messaging campaign except with your consent or as necessary to provide you communications about our services or services that you requested.
Data Rights
If you are in the
European Economic Area (EEA), Switzerland, or the UK
, or a resident of
California or another U.S. state
with an applicable privacy law, please refer to the respective dedicated sections below. Otherwise, at your request, and as required by applicable law, we will:
Inform you of what personal data we have about you that is under our control;
Amend or correct such personal data or any previous privacy preferences you selected, or direct you to
applicable tools; and/or
Delete such personal data or direct you to applicable tools.
In order to exercise any of your rights as to personal data controlled by Zoom, please click
here
. Where legally permitted, we may decline to process requests that are unreasonably repetitive or systematic, require disproportionate technical effort, or jeopardize the privacy of others. As an account owner or a user under a licensed account, you may also take steps to affect your personal data by visiting your account and modifying your personal data directly.
Children
Zoom does not allow children under the age of 16 to sign up for a Zoom account.
For educational organizations that use Zoom products and services to provide educational services to children under 18, Zoom’s Children’s Educational Privacy Statement is available
here
.
How to Contact Us
To exercise your rights, please click
here
. If you have any privacy-related questions or comments related to this Privacy Statement, please send an email to
privacy@zoom.us
.
You can also contact us by writing to the following address:
Zoom Communications, Inc.
Attention: Data Protection Officer
55 Almaden Blvd, Suite 600
San Jose, CA 95113
Or to our representative in the EU or UK:
Lionheart Squared (Europe) Limited
Attn: Data Privacy
2 Pembroke House
Upper Pembroke Street 28-32
Dublin
DO2 EK84
Republic of lreland
email:
zoom@LionheartSquared.eu
Lionheart Squared Limited
Attn: Data Privacy
17 Glasshouse Studios
Fryern Court Road
Fordingbridge
Hampshire
SP6 1QX
United Kingdom
Contact:
zoom@LionheartSquared.co.uk
You can contact our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to
privacy@zoom.us
.
Retention
We retain personal data for as long as required to engage in the uses described in this Privacy Statement, unless a longer retention period is required by applicable law.
The criteria used to determine our retention periods include the following:
The length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide Zoom products and services to you (for example, for as long as you have an account with us or keep using our products);
Whether account owners modify or their users delete information through their accounts;
Whether we have a legal obligation to keep the data (for example, certain laws require us to keep records of your transactions for a certain period of time before we can delete them); or
Whether retention is advisable in light of our legal position (such as in regard to the enforcement of our agreements, the resolution of disputes, and applicable statutes of limitations, litigation, or regulatory investigation).
European Data Protection Specific Information
Data Subjects Rights
If you are in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK, your rights in relation to your personal data processed by us as a controller specifically include:
Right of access and/or portability
: You have the right to access any personal data that we hold about you and, in some circumstances, have that data provided to you so that you can provide or “port” that data to another provider;
Right of erasure
: In certain circumstances, you have the right to the erasure of personal data that we hold about you (for example, if it is no longer necessary for the purposes for which it was originally collected);
Right to object to processing
: In certain circumstances, you have the right to request that we stop processing your personal data and/or stop sending you marketing communications;
Right to rectification
: You have the right to require us to correct any inaccurate or incomplete personal data;
Right to restrict processing
: You have the right to request that we restrict processing of your personal data in certain circumstances (for example, where you believe that the personal data we hold about you is not accurate or lawfully held).
To exercise your rights, please click
here
. If you have any other questions about our use of your personal data, please send a request at the contact details specified in the
How to Contact Us
section of this Privacy Statement. Please note that we may request you to provide us with additional information in order to confirm your identity and ensure that you are entitled to access the relevant personal data.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to a data protection authority. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.
Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
We only use your information in a lawful, transparent, and fair manner. Depending on the specific personal data concerned and the factual context, when Zoom processes personal data as a controller for individuals in regions such as the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK, we rely on the following legal bases as applicable in your jurisdiction:
As necessary for our contract:
When we enter into a contract directly with you, we process your personal data on the basis of our contract in order to prepare and enter into the contract, as well as to perform and manage our contract (i.e., providing Zoom products and services, features and services to account owners, their users, and those they invite to join meetings and webinars hosted on their accounts, and manage our relationship and contract, including billing, compliance with contractual obligations, and related administration). If we do not process your personal data for these purposes, we may not be able to provide you with all products and services;
Consistent with specific revocable consents:
We rely on your prior consent in order to utilize cookies to engage advertising and analytics partners to deliver tailored advertising and analysis of our website usage. You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time by visiting our cookie management tool, available Cookies Settings;
As necessary to comply with our legal obligations:
We process your personal data to comply with the legal obligations to which we are subject for the purposes of compliance with EEA laws, regulations, codes of practice, guidelines, or rules applicable to us, and for responses to requests from, and other communications with, competent EEA public, governmental, judicial, or other regulatory authorities. This includes detecting, investigating, preventing, and stopping fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, or illegal activity (“fraud and abuse detection”) and compliance with privacy laws;
To protect your vital interests or those of others:
We process certain personal data in order to protect vital interests for the purpose of detecting and preventing illicit activities that impact vital interests and public safety, including child sexual abuse material; and
As necessary for our (or others’) legitimate interests, unless those interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms, which require protection of personal data:
We process your personal data based on such legitimate interests to (i) enter and perform the contract with the account owner and/or reseller providing you with the products and services (which includes billing, compliance with contractual obligations, and related administration and support); (ii) develop, test, and improve our products and services and troubleshoot products and services; (iii) ensure authentication, integrity, security, and safety of accounts, activity, and products and services, including detect and prevent malicious conduct and violations of our terms and policies, prevent or investigate bad or unsafe experiences, and address security threats; (iv) send marketing communications, advertising, and promotions related to the products and services; and (v) comply with non-EEA laws, regulations, codes of practice, guidelines, or rules applicable to us and respond to requests from, and other communications with, competent non-EEA public, governmental, judicial, or other regulatory authorities, as well as meet our corporate and social responsibility commitments, protect our rights and property and the ones of our customers, resolve disputes, and enforce agreements.
International Data Transfers
Zoom operates globally, which means personal data may be transferred, stored (for example, in a data center), and processed outside of the country or region where it was initially collected where Zoom or its service providers have customers or facilities – including in countries where meeting participants or account owners hosting meetings or webinars that you participate in or receiving messages that you send are based.
Therefore, by using Zoom products and services or providing personal data for any of the purposes stated above, you acknowledge that your personal data may be transferred to or stored in the United States where we are established, as well as in other countries outside of the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK. Such countries may have data protection rules that are different and less protective than those of your country.
We protect your personal data in accordance with this Privacy Statement wherever it is processed and take appropriate contractual or other steps to protect it under applicable laws. Where personal data of users in the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK is being transferred to a recipient located in a country outside the EEA, Switzerland, or the UK which has not been recognized as having an adequate level of data protection, we ensure that the transfer is governed by the European Commission’s standard contractual clauses. Please contact us if you would like further information in that respect.
Zoom complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Zoom has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Zoom has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Zoom commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU and UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Zoom at: privacy@zoom.us..
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Zoom commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Zoom Communications, Inc., Zoom Voice Communications, Inc., and Solvvy, Inc., are adhering to the DPF Principles. The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Zoom’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
If third-party agents process personal data on our behalf in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, we remain liable unless we prove we are not responsible for the event giving rise to any damages. If you have a question or complaint related to our compliance with the DPF Principles, please contact us as indicated at the bottom of this privacy statement.
Under limited circumstances and after other available dispute resolution mechanisms have been exhausted, binding arbitration is available to address certain residual complaints under the DPF not resolved by other means.
California & Other U.S. States Notice at Collection
Categories of Personal Information Zoom Receives:
Zoom may collect, or process on behalf of our customers, the following categories of personal data, as described above, in the
“What Personal Data Do We Receive?”
; section: identifiers (such as in Account Information, Profile and Participant Information, Contact Information, and Registration Information), financial account information (such as in Account Information); commercial information (such as in Account Information); internet or other electronic network activity information (such as Device Information, Usage Information Regarding Meetings, Webinars, Message, Collaborative Features, and the Website, and Limited Information from Zoom Email and Calendar Services); audio, electronic, and visual information (such as in Content and Context from Meetings, Webinars, Messaging, and Other Collaborative Features) education information such as from university customers; inferences we derive from the preceding or other information we collect; and sensitive personal information (such as certain categories in Account Information, Content and Context from Meetings, Webinars, Messaging, and Other Collaborative Features.
Sources:
We receive information from sources as described in the
“What Personal Data Do We Receive?”
; section, including: from you (including through your use of our products and services); from partners; from customers; and from publicly available sources. We collect education information from schools that use our services. Please see our
Children’s Educational Privacy Statement
for more information.
Zoom’s business and commercial purposes for use:
Zoom uses personal data for the following business and commercial purposes: to provide Zoom Products and Services; for Product Research and Development; for Marketing and Promotions (Zoom does not use meeting, webinar, or messaging content, or any content generated or shared as part of other collaborative features for any marketing or promotions); Authentication, Integrity, Security, and Safety; to Communicate with You; and for Legal Reasons. For more information, please see
“Data We Process & How We Use It.”
; Categories of third parties to whom we disclose Personal Information for business purposes are described in
“How Do We Share Personal Data?”
;
Zoom may permit advertising and analytics services that are intended to deliver advertising to you and/or analyze your interactions, based on your interactions with our website or app which may constitute a “sale” or “sharing” of data for targeted advertising purposes under certain state privacy laws. See “California & Other U.S. State Privacy Rights” for more information regarding your right to opt-out.
Retention:
Zoom retains personal data for as long as required to engage in the uses described in this Privacy Statement, unless a longer retention period is required by applicable law. Additional detail on retention criteria can be found under
Retention
, above.
California & Other U.S. State Privacy Rights
Under some U.S. state laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (as amended by the California Consumer Privacy Rights Act) (CCPA), residents may have a right to:
Access
the categories and specific pieces of personal data Zoom has collected, the categories of sources from which the personal data is collected, the business purpose(s) for collecting the personal data, and the categories of third parties with whom Zoom has shared personal data, and
obtain the personal data
in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format;
Delete
personal data under certain circumstances;
Correct
personal data under certain circumstances; and
Opt out of the “sale” of personal data or “sharing” of personal data for targeted advertising purposes.
We do not sell your personal data in the conventional sense. However, like many companies, we may use advertising and analytics services that are intended to analyze your interactions with our website or app, based on information obtained from cookies or other trackers, including for delivering advertising to you (such as interest-based, targeted, or cross-context behavioral advertising). You can get more information and opt out of the use of cookies and other trackers on our website and app by clicking the
Cookies Settings
Your Privacy Choices, also on our homepage, and setting your preferences. You will need to set your preferences from each device and each web browser from which you wish to opt out. This feature uses a cookie to remember your preference, so if you clear all cookies from your browser, you will need to re-select your preferred settings. California and Connecticut residents may also set the Global Privacy Control (GPC) to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information for targeted advertising for each participating browser system that you use. Zoom does not have actual knowledge that it “sells” or “shares” the personal information of consumers under 16 years of age.
Appeal
a denial of your request. Some states provide additional rights to their residents. If we decline to process your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision. You can do so by replying directly to our denial or emailing
privacy@zoom.us
.
Zoom will not discriminate against you for exercising any of these rights, which is further in line with your rights under state law.
Sensitive Information.
Zoom receives information that may be considered sensitive under some state laws, such as certain Account Information (e.g., financial information, log-in information), certain Content and Context from Meetings, Webinars, Messaging, and Other Collaborative Features and certain Limited Information from Zoom Email and Calendar Services (e.g., messaging content in cases described in this statement) as well as voiceprints and facial geometry, if you choose to enable certain features and provide the requisite consent. Zoom processes sensitive personal information to provide Zoom products and services, for product research and development, for authentication, integrity, security, and safety reasons, to communicate with you, for legal reasons, and with your consent. Zoom does not use or disclose sensitive personal information (as defined under CCPA) for purposes of inferring characteristics about a consumer, or in any way that would require Zoom to provide a right to limit under the CCPA. Under certain laws, residents may also be permitted to opt out of certain profiling relating to automated processing analyzing certain categories of an individual’s information that would produce a legal or similarly significant effect. Zoom does not engage in this type of profiling of individuals.
To exercise your rights, please click
here
. California residents may also call +1-888-799-0566. To opt out of the use of cookies on our sites for interest-based advertising purposes, follow the instructions above.
We will acknowledge receipt of your request within 10 business days, and provide a substantive response within 45 calendar days, or inform you of the reason and extension period (up to a total of 90 days) in writing.
These rights are not absolute, are subject to exceptions and limitations, and may not be afforded to residents of all states. In certain cases, we may decline requests to exercise these rights where permitted by law. We will need to verify your identity to process your access, deletion, and correction requests and reserve the right to confirm your state residency. To verify your identity, we may require you to log into your existing Zoom account (if applicable), give a declaration as to your identity under penalty of perjury, and/or provide additional information, such as providing at least two pieces of personal information relating to your account (which will be compared to information we have, such as profile information) or as we otherwise may already have in our possession, such as your email address and phone number. We will verify your consumer request by comparing the information you provide to information already in our possession, and take additional steps to minimize the risk of fraud. You may designate an authorized agent to submit your verified consumer request by providing written permission and verifying your identity, or through proof of power of attorney.
To see our Disclosure of Privacy Rights Requests, please click
here
.
California’s Shine the Light Law
Under California’s Shine the Light law, you may also ask companies with whom you have formed a business relationship primarily for personal, family or household purposes to provide the names of third parties to which they have disclosed certain personal information (as defined under the Shine the Light law) during the preceding calendar year for their own direct marketing purposes and the categories of personal information disclosed. You may send us requests for this information to
privacy@zoom.us
. In your request, you must include the statement “Shine the Light Request,” and provide your first and last name and mailing address and certify that you are a California resident. We reserve the right to require additional information to confirm your identity and California residency. Please note that we will not accept requests via telephone, mail, or facsimile, and we are not responsible for notices that are not labeled or sent properly, or that do not have complete information.
Changes to This Privacy Statement
We may update this Privacy Statement periodically to account for changes in our collection and/or processing of personal data, and will post the updated Privacy Statement on our website, with a “Last Updated” date at the top and an Update Note at the bottom. If we make material changes to this Privacy Statement, we will notify you and provide you an opportunity to review before you choose to continue using our products and services.
Privacy Statement Update Notes (August 2, 2024):
Updates to describe the processing of personal data related to enhanced audio and video features.
Privacy Statement Update Notes (October 11, 2024):
Updates to describe the processing of personal data related to enhanced audio features.
Updates to describe new intelligent feature functionality, including related integration options.
Zoom uses cookies and similar technologies as strictly necessary to make our site work. We and our partners would also like to set additional cookies to analyze your use of our site, to personalize and enhance your visit to our site and to show you more relevant content and advertising.  These will be set only if you accept.
You can always review and change your cookie preferences through our cookie settings page.  For more information, please read our
Privacy Statement
.
Decline Cookies
Accept Cookies
Cookies Settings
Cookie Preference Center
Cookies and other similar technologies (“Cookies”) are important to the proper functioning of a site and to provide visitors with a seamless and customized experience.  Zoom uses Cookies to enable you to use our site. We also use cookies to enable you to personalize your use of our site, to provide you enhanced functionality and to continuously improve the performance of our site. If you have Targeting cookies enabled below and depending on your account type or login state, we may allow third-party advertisers to show you advertising relevant to you on our website or products, using their Cookies on our site.
You can accept or decline all but Strictly Necessary Cookies, or customize your cookie settings below. You can change your cookie settings at any time. Some Strictly Necessary Cookies may transfer personal data to the United States.  To learn more about how Zoom processes personal data, please visit our
privacy statement
.
For California Residents, you may exercise your right to “Opt-Out of the Sale of Personal Information” by toggling the button labeled “Targeting” below to off.
More information
Accept All Cookies
Manage Consent Preferences
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to track your usage of our website and, depending on their policies, may combine that information with other information to show you relevant advertisements on our site and other sites. If you do not allow these cookies, you will not see personalized advertising on Zoom’s website or products.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and customization. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Always Active
These cookies are strictly necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 2
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Privacy Center home
Search
Privacy topics
More privacy resources
Privacy Policy
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
What information do we collect?
How do we use your information?
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
How do we share information with third parties?
How do the Meta Companies work together?
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
How long do we keep your information?
How do we transfer information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
How will you know the Policy has changed?
How to contact Meta with questions
Legal basis information
Other policies and articles
Settings
Privacy Policy
How we use info for AI at Meta
Based on feedback from regulators, we’re still delaying our plans to use your information from Meta Products to develop and improve
AI at Meta
. We’ll let you know before we start using this information for this purpose, and how you can exercise your right to object.
Other updates
We're updating our Privacy Policy. The updates go into effect on April 7, 2025.
Read the new policy.
What is the Privacy Policy and what does it cover?
Effective November 14, 2024
|
View printable version
|
See previous versions
Highlights
We at Meta want you to understand what information we collect, and how we use and share it. That’s why we encourage you to read our Privacy Policy. This helps you use
Meta Products
in the way that’s right for you.
In the Privacy Policy, we explain how we collect, use, share, retain and transfer information. We also let you know your rights. Each section of this Policy includes helpful examples and simpler language to make our practices easier to understand. We’ve also added links to resources where you can learn more about the privacy topics that interest you.
It's important to us that you know how to control your privacy, so we also show you where you can manage your information in the settings of the Meta Products you use. You can
update these settings
to shape your experience.
Read the full Policy below.
What Products does this Policy cover?
Learn more in Privacy Center about managing your privacy
What information do we collect?
Highlights
The information we collect and process about you depends on how you use our
Products
. For example, we collect different information if you sell furniture on Marketplace than if you post a reel on Instagram. When you use our Products, we collect some information about you
even if you don't have an account
.
Here's the information we collect:
Your activity and information you provide
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
Information from partners, vendors and other third parties
What if you don’t let us collect certain information?
Some information is required for our Products to work. Other information is optional, but without it, the quality of your experience might be affected.
Learn more
What if the information we collect doesn’t identify individuals?
In some cases information is de-identified, aggregated, or anonymized by third parties so that it no longer identifies individuals before it’s made available to us. We use this information as described below without trying to re-identify individuals.
Take control
Manage the information we collect about you
Privacy Center
How do we use your information?
Highlights
We use
information we collect
to provide a personalized experience to you, including ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products), along with the other purposes we explain in detail below.
For some of these purposes, we use information
across our Products
from the accounts you choose to add to your Accounts Center, and
across your devices
. The information we use for these purposes is automatically processed by our systems. But in some cases, we also use
manual review
to access and review your information.
To use less information that’s connected to individual users, in some cases we de-identify or aggregate information or anonymize it so that it no longer identifies you. We use this information in the same ways we use your information as described in this section.
Here are the ways we use your information:
To provide, personalize and improve our Products
We use information we have to provide and improve our
Products
. This includes personalizing features, content and
recommendations
, such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
, Stories and ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products). We use
information with special protections
you choose to provide for these purposes, but not to show you ads.
Read more about how we use information to provide, personalize and improve our Products:
How we show ads (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
How we use information to improve our Products
How we use location-related information
To promote safety, security and integrity
We use information we collect to help protect people from harm and provide safe, secure Products.
Learn more
To provide measurement, analytics and business services
Lots of people rely on our Products to run or promote their businesses or share content. We help them measure how well their ads and other content, products and services are working.
Learn more
To communicate with you
We communicate with you using information you've given us, like contact information you've entered on your profile.
Learn more
To research and innovate for social good
We use information we have, information from researchers and datasets from publicly available sources, professional groups and non-profit groups to conduct and support research.
Learn more
How is your information shared on Meta Products or with integrated partners?
Highlights
On Meta Products
Learn more about the different cases when your information can be shared on our
Products
:
People and accounts you share and communicate with
Content others share or reshare about you
Public content
With integrated partners
You can choose to connect with
integrated partners
who use our Products. If you do, these integrated partners receive information about you and your activity.
These integrated partners can always access information that’s public on our Products. Learn more about other information they receive and how they handle your information:
When you use an integrated partner’s product or service
When you interact with someone else’s content on an integrated partner’s product or service
How integrated partners handle your information
Take control
Learn more about audiences
Privacy Center
Manage apps and websites
How do we share information with third parties?
Highlights
We don't sell any of your information to anyone, and we never will. We also require
partners
and other
third parties
to follow rules about how they can and cannot use and disclose the information we provide.
Here’s more detail about who we share information with:
Partners
Advertisers and Audience Network publishers (if we show you ads on Meta Products)
Partners who use our analytics services
Partners who offer goods or services on our Products and commerce services platforms
Integrated partners
Vendors
Measurement vendors
Marketing vendors
Service providers
Service providers
Third parties
External researchers
AI integrations
Other third parties
We also share information with other
third parties
in response to legal requests, to comply with applicable law or to prevent harm.
Read the Policy
.
And if we sell or transfer all or part of our business to someone else, in some cases we’ll give the new owner your information as part of that transaction, but only as the law allows.
How do the Meta Companies work together?
Highlights
We are part of the
Meta Companies
that provide Meta Company Products.
Meta Company Products
include all the
Meta Products
covered by this Policy, plus other products like WhatsApp and more.
We share information we collect, infrastructure, systems and technology with the other Meta Companies.
Learn more
about how we transfer information to other countries.
We also process information that we receive about you from other Meta Companies, according to their terms and policies and as permitted by applicable law. In some cases, Meta acts as a
service provider
for other Meta Companies. We act on their behalf and in accordance with their instructions and terms.
Why we share across the Meta Companies
Meta Products share information with other Meta Companies:
To promote safety, security and integrity and comply with applicable laws
To provide optional features and integrations
To understand how people use and interact with Meta Company Products
See some examples
of why we share.
More resources
Review the privacy policies of the other Meta Companies
Facebook Help Center
What is our legal basis for processing your information, and what are your rights?
Highlights
Under applicable data protection law, companies must have a legal basis to process personal data. When we talk about "processing personal data," we mean the ways we collect, use and share your information, as we described in the other sections of this Policy above.
What is our legal basis?
You have the following rights under GDPR and other relevant data protection laws:
Access and correct information
Withdraw consent
Port your information
Download your information
Erase information
Object
Make a complaint
How long do we keep your information?
Highlights
We keep information as long as we need it to provide our Products, comply with legal obligations or protect our or other’s interests. We decide how long we need information on a case-by-case basis. Here’s what we consider when we decide:
If we need it to operate or provide our Products. For example, we need to keep some of your information to maintain your account.
Learn more
.
The feature we use it for, and how that feature works. For example, messages sent using Messenger’s vanish mode are retained for less time than regular messages.
Learn more
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
See some examples
.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm; investigate possible violations of our terms or policies; promote safety, security and integrity; or protect ourselves, including our rights, property or products
In some instances and for specific reasons, we’ll keep information for an extended period of time.
Read our Policy
about when we may preserve your information.
How do we transfer information?
Highlights
Why is information transferred to other countries?
Where is information transferred?
How do we safeguard your information?
How do we respond to legal requests, comply with applicable law and prevent harm?
Highlights
We access, preserve, use and share your information:
In response to legal requests, like search warrants, court orders, production orders or subpoenas. These requests come from
third parties
such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
Learn more
about when we respond to legal requests.
In accordance with applicable law
To promote the safety, security and integrity of
Meta Products
, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
.
We may access or preserve your information for an extended amount of time.
Learn more
.
How will you know the Policy has changed?
We'll notify you before we make material changes to this Policy. You’ll have the opportunity to review the revised Policy before you choose to continue using our Products.
How to contact Meta with questions
You can learn more about how privacy works on
Facebook
and on
Instagram
, and in the
Facebook Help Center
. If you have questions about this Policy, or have questions, complaints or requests regarding your information, you can contact us as described below.
The data controller responsible for your information is Meta Platforms Ireland Limited, which you can
contact online
, or by mail at:
Meta Platforms Ireland Limited
ATTN: Privacy Operations
Merrion Road
Dublin 4
D04 X2K5, Ireland
Contact the Data Protection Officer
for Meta Platforms Ireland Limited.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with Meta Platforms Ireland's lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, or your local supervisory authority.
Legal basis information
Consent
We process information as described below when you have given us your consent to do so, which we may ask through in-product experiences, to enable particular features, or to enable device-based settings. The categories of information we use and why and how they are processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Processing information with special protections that you provide so we can share it with those you choose, to provide, personalise and improve our Products and to undertake analytics.  We’ll collect, store, publish and apply automated, or sometimes manual, processing for these purposes.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Any information with special protections that you choose to provide, such as your religious views, your sexual orientation, political views, health, racial or ethnic origin, philosophical beliefs or trade union membership, or as part of surveys you choose to participate in, and where you have given your explicit consent
Personalizing ads on the Meta Products:
If we show you ads on Meta Products, including Meta Audience Network, depending on your
settings
, we will use your information across the account(s) in your Accounts Centre to show you ads, including using cookies, to personalize your ads and measure how those ads perform.
If we show you ads on Meta Products, our ads system automatically processes information that we've collected and stored associated with you. In accordance with your Ad settings, our ads system uses this information to understand your interests and your preferences and personalize your ads across the Meta Products.
Learn more
about your Ad settings.
Our ads system prioritizes what ad to show you based on what audience advertisers want to reach. Then we match the ad to people who might be interested.
Learn more
about how our ads system works.
Learn more
about how we choose the ads that you see.
You can change your choice at any time in your “Ad Preferences”.
Your activity and information that you provide
:
Content that you create, such as posts, comments or audio
Content that you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content, including ads, that you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features that you use and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions that you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you're doing on your device, such as whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users'
Device signals
Information that you've shared through your device settings (e.g. GPS location)
Information about the network that you connect your device to
Location-related  information
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Using information from partners, vendors and other third parties to tailor the ads you see: If we show you ads on Meta Products, with your consent we’ll use information that partners, vendors and other third parties provide us about activity off the Meta Products and that we have associated with you to personalize ads that we show you on the Meta Products, and on websites, apps and devices that use our advertising services. We receive this information whether or not you’re logged in or have an account on our Products, see the
Cookies Policy
for more information.
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request when you use some of our Products. For example, when you direct us we share your email address or other information that you might choose to share with an advertiser so that they can contact you with additional information about a promoted product. The type of third party and categories of information shared depend on the circumstances of what you ask us to share.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like your contact, profile or other information, like posts or comments
Collecting information that you allow us to receive through the device-based settings you enable (such as access to your GPS location, camera or photos) which we use to provide the features or services described when you enable the setting.
App, browser and device information
:
Information from device settings
Verifying your identity or account, or helping to protect against suspicious activity including impersonation and identity misuse, using face analysis which may include facial recognition technology if you select it.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Your account information, profile photo, or
your photo or video selfie, if you choose to provide it
When we process information that you provide to us based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal. You also have the right to port that information you provide to us based on your consent. To exercise your rights, visit your device-based settings, and visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings and our Help Centers.
Performance of a contract
For all people who have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract (for example, by being the age of majority or above in their country of residence), we process information as necessary to conclude and perform our contracts with you (the
Meta Terms
and
Instagram Terms
, the
Supplemental Meta Platforms Technologies Terms of Service
, the
Supplemental Portal Terms of Service
, the
Meta AI Terms of Service
and the
Supplemental Meta View Terms of Service
, together, the “terms"). The purposes for which we process information for our contracts, the categories of information we use and how information is processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Personalising the Meta Products (other than ads): Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
Facebook Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories); and
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, and in some instances not only automated processing but also manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features,
Undertake analytics, and
Facilitate your purchases and payments on Meta Pay or other Meta checkout experiences.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts, identity and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the
Oversight Board
,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review and, in some cases, remove content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To communicate with you: We use information you’ve given us (like contact information on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
We’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your e-mail address to respond when you contact us.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Transferring, storing or processing your information globally. We share information we collect globally, both internally across our offices and data centers and externally with our partners, third parties and service providers. Because Meta is global, with users, partners and employees around the world, transfers are necessary to:
Operate and provide the services described in the terms that apply to the Meta Product(s) you are using. This includes allowing you to share information and connect with your family and friends around the globe; and
So we can fix, analyze and improve our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
We'll use the information we have to provide these services; if you choose not to provide certain information (other than limited account information which is necessary to create a
Facebook account
or an
Instagram account
), your experience using the Meta Products may be affected. For example, you may see less relevant recommendations on the Products, or your use of the Products may be restricted.
When we process information that you provide to us as necessary for concluding or performing our contracts with you, you have the right to port it under the GDPR. To exercise your rights, visit the Facebook settings and Instagram settings, or learn more in our Help Centers.
Compliance with a legal obligation
The categories of information we use, why we process your information based on compliance with a legal obligation and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
For processing information when the law requires it: Where we are under an obligation to disclose information such as, for example, if we receive a valid legal request for certain information (such as an Irish search warrant), we will access, preserve and / or share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others.
The way in which the information will be processed depends on the specific circumstances, see
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and integrity?
for more.
Information for Law Enforcement Authorities
provides information on the operational guidelines law enforcement needs to follow.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to process the information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order or otherwise required to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006, or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required.
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations such as the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the General Data Protection Regulation and the Data Protection Act 2018.
Financial matters: to comply with our obligations under applicable financial services law such as the European Union (Payment Services) Regulations 2018
View the
current list of laws
which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Meta which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information and we will update this list from time to time.
The categories of information depend on the specific circumstances of each mandatory request or obligation. Only the information necessary to comply with the relevant legal obligation will be processed. For example, for civil matters, this will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information). However, depending on the circumstances it could include the following:
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Legitimate interests
We rely on our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of a third party, where they are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms ("legitimate interests"). The categories of information we use, the legitimate interests relied on and why and how it’s processed are set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Legitimate interests relied on
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
If you are a registered user of the Meta Products
For people under the age of majority (under 18, in most applicable countries) who have a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity.
Personalising the Meta Products: Our systems automatically process information we have collected and stored associated with you and others to assess and understand your interests and your preferences and provide you personalised experiences across the Meta Products in accordance with our terms. This is how we:
Personalise features and content (such as your
News Feed
,
Instagram Feed
and Stories),
Make suggestions for you (such as people you may know, groups or events that you may be interested in or topics that you may want to follow) on and off our Products.
Learn more
about how we use information about you to personalise your experience on and across Meta Products and how we choose the ads that you see.
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings (like GPS location)
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to
Reports about our Products’ performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
(other than using partner data to tailor ads to you)
Providing and improving our Meta Products: The provision of the Meta Products includes collecting, storing, and, where relevant, sharing, profiling, reviewing and curating, automated processing, and in some instances manual (human) reviewing, to:
Create and maintain your account and profile,
Connect your Meta Products account, including your public profile information, to an integrated partner to sign in or share your information,
Facilitate the sharing of content and status,
Provide and curate features,
Provide messaging services, the ability to make voice and video calls and connect with others,
Provide advertising products,
Provide and curate
artificial intelligence technology
in our Products, enabling the creation of content like text, audio, images and videos, including by understanding and recognising your use of content in the features, and
Undertake analytics.
We also use information we have to develop, research and test improvements to our Products. We use information we collect to:
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To create, provide, support and maintain innovative products and features that enable people under the age of majority to express themselves, communicate, discover and engage with information and communities relevant to their interests, build community and utilise tools and features that promote their well-being.
To enable people under the age of majority to use and connect to the Meta Products in an easy and intuitive manner.
To provide, personalize and improve the Meta Products in a consistent manner while ensuring additional safeguards for those under their Member State's age of consent.
The legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Meta Products and those Products being personalised to each user.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Your public profile information (including your name, username and profile picture)
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promoting safety, integrity and security on and across the Meta Products: The Meta Products are designed to help ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.  We process information we have associated with you and apply automated processing techniques and, in some instances, conduct manual (human) review to:
Verify accounts and activity,
Find and address violations of our terms or policies. In some cases, the decisions we make about violations are reviewed by the Oversight Board,
Investigate suspicious activity,
Detect, prevent and combat harmful or unlawful behavior, such as to review, and in some cases remove, content reported to us,
Detect and prevent spam and other bad experiences,
Detect and stop threats to our personnel and property, and
Maintain the integrity of our Products.
For more information on safety, integrity and security generally on the Meta Products, visit the Facebook Security Help Center and Instagram Security Tips.
To secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, and to protect the safety of people under the age of majority, including to prevent exploitation or other harms to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable.
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content, subject to
applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating with you:
We use information you have given us (like contact information you’ve entered on your profile) to send you a communication, like an e-mail or in-product notice, for example:
we’ll contact you via email or in-product notifications in relation to the Meta Products, product-related issues, research or to let you know about our terms and policies.
We also use contact information like your email address to respond to you when you contact us.
To share meaningful updates with our users under the age of majority about our Products and promoting our Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Contact information on your profile and your communications with us
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
For all people, including those under the age of majority
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and how their content is performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help users, businesses, and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their content, websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realise using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our other partners; and
In the interests of developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
If we show you ads on Meta Products:
Providing measurement, analytics and other business services to businesses, advertisers and other partners:
Our systems automatically, as well as with some manual (human) processing, process information we have collected and stored about you and others. We use this information to:
Provide insights and measurement reports to businesses, advertisers and other partners to help them measure the effectiveness and distribution of their, or their client's ads, content and services, to understand the kinds of people who are seeing their content and ads, and how their content and ads are performing on and off the Meta Products, and
Provide aggregated user analytics and insights reports that help businesses, advertisers and other partners better understand things like the audiences with whom they may want to connect, as well as the types of people who use their products and services and how people interact with their websites, apps, products and services, including to connect to Meta Products, and the performance of their connection and networks and users’ experience with them.
In our interest to provide accurate and reliable reporting to our businesses, advertisers, and other partners, to ensure accurate pricing and statistics on performance and to demonstrate the value that our partners realize using Meta Company Products, and to provide suitable payment and billing options to our advertisers and other partners; and
In the interests of advertisers, developers and other partners to help them understand their customers and improve their businesses, validate our pricing models and evaluate the effectiveness of their products, services, online content and advertising on and off the Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Communicating, engaging and sharing across the Meta Company Products:
To provide a seamless, consistent and richer, innovative, experience across the Meta Company Products and to enable cross app interactions, sharing, viewing and engaging with content, including posts and videos.
In our interest to provide seamless, consistent and richer, innovative communication, engagement and sharing experiences across Meta Company Products.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Business intelligence and analytics:
To understand, in aggregate, your usage of and across our Products, to accurately count people and businesses; and
Validate metrics directly related to these, in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to adhere to (shareholder/earning) reporting obligations.
In our interest to measure the use of our Products and count the people who interact with our Products in order to inform and improve product direction and development and to enable provision of accurate and reliable reporting.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Location-related information
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you:
Depending on your settings, we’ll share marketing communications with you.
We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide, including your contact information like e-mail address
App, browser and device information
:
Device identifiers
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from researchers we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
For example, we analyse information that we have about migration patterns during crises. This helps relief organizations get aid to the right places.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation of information as well as manual (human) review, and share information, as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programmes.
In our interest and those of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Anonymising your information
In some cases, we anonymise information we have about you, such as your activity on and off our Products, and use the resulting information, for example, to provide and improve our Meta Products, including ads.
In our interest to fund our provision of the Meta Products, provide relevant advertising to users, and improve ads delivery and Meta Products;
In the interests of advertisers to help them to reach relevant audiences who may be interested in their information, products or services;
In the interests of users that Meta practice data minimisation and privacy by design in respect of their information
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to and your connection, including your IP address
Reports about our Products' performance on your device
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to legal requests.
See
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Location-related information
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Promote safety, integrity and security in limited circumstances outside of the performance of our contracts with you:
Our Meta Products are delivered to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We apply automated processing, as well as manual (human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Sharing your contact, profile or other information with third parties upon your request:
You may choose to share your contact information, profile information and other data with our partners: The types of partners with whom information is shared depends on the features of our service that you use and the manner in which you choose to use them. For example, you may choose to share your email address, birthday, friends list, hometown or other information with a partner if you choose to connect your Facebook account to their app.
To deliver  quality experiences to users who use our partners’ apps, in our best interest and in the interest of our users.
To facilitate and improve users' experiences in their apps, in the interests of our partners who want to facilitate and improve consumers' experiences in their apps.
Information you provide (for example, your email address, birthday, friends’ list and hometown).
If you are using a device we cannot associate with a registered user of the Meta Products
Promote safety, integrity and security:
Our Meta Products are delivered in a manner to ensure the safety, integrity and security of those services and those people who enjoy them.
We collect and store information we have for this purpose and apply automated processing and manual (i.e. human) review to verify accounts and activity, combat harmful conduct, detect and prevent spam and other security matters as well as bad experiences of other types, maintain the integrity of our Products, and research and promote safety, integrity and security on and off Meta Products.
For example, we use information that we have to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies, or to detect when someone needs help.
To learn more, visit the
Facebook Security Help Centre
and
Instagram Security Tips
.
In our interest to secure our platform and network, to verify accounts and activity, to combat harmful conduct, to detect, prevent, and address spam and other bad experiences, to keep the Meta Company Products free of harmful or inappropriate content, and to investigate and take action in respect of suspicious activity or breaches of our terms or policies; and
In the interests of our users generally and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Providing marketing communications to you: We’ll collect and store your information and use it to send marketing communications to you, like an e-mail address.
In our interest to promote Meta Company Products and send our direct marketing.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Information and content you provide including your contact information like your e-mail address
Research and innovate for social good:
We carry out surveys and use information (including from research partners we collaborate with) to conduct and support research and innovation on topics of general social welfare, technological advancement, public interest, health and well-being.
We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to research and innovate for social good in this way.
We support research in areas like artificial intelligence and machine learning.
Learn more
about our research programs.
In our interest and in the interest of the general public to further the state-of-the-art or academic understanding on important social issues that affect our society and world in a positive way.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Share information with others including law enforcement and to respond to
legal requests
.
See '
How do we respond to legal requests, prevent harm and promote safety and security?
' for information on when we share information with law enforcement and others.
The categories of information we access, preserve, use and share depend on the specific circumstances. For example, responses to legal requests where not compelled by law, will typically include limited information (such as contact details and login information).
However, the information we process will depend on the purposes, which could include the following:
In response to
legal requests
from third parties such as civil litigants, law enforcement and other government authorities.
To comply with applicable law or legitimate legal purposes.
To promote the safety, security and integrity of Meta, Meta Products, Products, users, employees, property and the public.
Learn more
about how we promote safety, security and integrity.
In our interest and the interest of the general public to prevent and address fraud, unauthorised use of the Meta Company Products, violations of our terms or policies, or other harmful or illegal activity; to protect ourselves (including our rights, Meta personnel and property or Meta Products), our users or others, including as part of investigations or regulatory enquiries; or to prevent death or imminent bodily harm.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Provide and improve our Products:
We use information we collect to:
Provide products and curate features
See if a product is working correctly
Troubleshoot and fix it when it’s not
Test out new products and features to see if they work
Get feedback on our ideas for products or features
Conduct surveys and other research about what you like about our Products and brands and what we can do better
To improve the Meta Company Products in a consistent manner, to correct technical glitches, and to optimise functionality.
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary to pursue our legitimate interests or those of a third party, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, such processing; to exercise your right, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings.
We will consider several factors when assessing an objection, including: our users' reasonable expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort. Unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons, your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
If you are under the age of majority in your country and there is no enforceable contract in place, we will take particular account of the fact that you are below the age of majority when conducting our assessment of our legitimate interests and the balancing  of your interests and rights. We provide specific protections for people below the age of majority to ensure that they are aware of the risks, consequences, safeguards and rights associated with the processing of their information.
Tasks carried out in the public interest
The purposes for which we anticipate processing your information as a task in the public interest, the processing we undertake, and the information we use is set out below:
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)

        The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Undertaking research for social good:  We collect, store, combine, analyse and apply automatic processing techniques like aggregation to information as well as manual (human) review as necessary to undertake research and other tasks in the public interest, such as sharing relevant research data with third parties like international organisations and academics both in and outside the EEA. The public interest is required to be laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Articles 168 and 179 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
To promote safety, integrity and security: In limited fact specific circumstances, we will access, preserve and share your information with regulators, law enforcement or others where necessary to perform a task in the public interest. For example, we might share information with others for the purposes of combatting unlawful or harmful behaviour where it is in the public interest to do so and where the public interest is laid down in Union law or Member State law or other applicable law to which we are subject. In this case, we rely on Section 53 of the Data Protection Act 2018 and Regulation (EU) 2021/1232.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Metadata about content
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from Partners, vendors and third parties
When we process your information as necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our processing. To exercise your rights, visit the
Facebook settings
and the
Help Center
and Instagram settings. In assessing an objection, we will consider several factors, including: our users' reasonable user expectations; the benefits and risks to you, us, other users or third parties; and other available means to achieve the same purpose that may be less invasive and do not require disproportionate effort.
Your objection will be upheld, and we will cease processing your information, unless we find that we have compelling legitimate grounds for this processing which are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms or the processing is needed for legal reasons. To learn more about the circumstances in which an objection may be successful, please visit the
Help Center
.
Protection of your vital interests or that of another person
The categories of information we use, why we process your information to protect your vital interests or those of another person and how it’s processed are set out below
Why and how we process your information
Information categories we use (see '
What Information do we collect?
' for more detail on each information category)
        
The actual information we use depends on your factual circumstances, but could include any of the following:
Protecting the vital interests of you and/or those of another person: We apply automated processing techniques, conduct manual (human) review and share information, including with law enforcement and others, in circumstances where someone’s vital interests require protection, such as in the case of emergencies. These vital interests include protection of your life, physical or mental health, wellbeing or integrity or that of others, and detecting, removing, and reporting illegal content. In protecting such vital interests we aim to combat harmful conduct and promote safety, integrity and security, including, for example, when we are investigating reports of harmful conduct or taking appropriate action, such as sharing information with relevant authorities, when someone needs help.
Your activity and information you provide
:
Content you create, like posts, comments or audio
Content you provide through our camera feature or your camera roll settings, or through our voice-enabled features
Messages you send and receive, including their content,
subject to applicable law
Metadata about content and messages
Types of content you view or interact with, and how you interact with it
Apps and features you use, and what actions you take in them
Purchases or other transactions you make, including truncated credit card information
Hashtags you use
The time, frequency and duration of your activities on our Products
Your photo or video selfie if you provide it when you contact us for account support
Friends, followers and other connections
App, browser and device information
:
Device characteristics and device software
What you’re doing on your device, like whether our app is in the foreground or if your mouse is moving (which can help tell humans from bots)
Identifiers that tell your device apart from other users’
Device signals
Information you’ve shared through your device settings
Location-related information
Information about the network you connect your device to, including your IP address
Information from cookies and similar technologies
Information from partners, vendors and third parties
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to provide and improve content on Facebook Products, provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and provide and improve Facebook Products for people who have an account.
Learn more about essential and optional cookies
.
You can learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choice at any time in our
Cookie Policy
.
Allow all cookies
Only allow essential cookies